GAO  REPORT  ON  NOAA’S

WEATHER  SATELLITE  PROGRAM

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

SEPTEMBER  29,  2006

Serial No. 109–66

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

29–950PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas
DORIS  MATSUI,  California

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S
September  29,  2006

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Sherwood  L.  Boehlert,  Chairman,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Minority  Ranking  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on
Environment,  Technology,  and  Standards,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative David Wu, Minority Ranking Member,
Subcommittee  on  Environment,  Technology,  and  Standards,  Committee  on
Science, U.S. House of Representatives .............................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Jerry F. Costello, Member, Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................

Witnesses:

Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher,  Jr.  (Ret.),  Under  Secretary  of  Com-
merce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-
ministration

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management  Issues,

Government Accountability Office

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Discussion

Estimated Cost of GOES–R Program .................................................................
Congress’ Continuing Oversight Role .................................................................
Risk of NOAA’s Sole Procurement Responsibilities ..........................................
Price Estimates ....................................................................................................
Improvements Over NPOESS Program .............................................................
Concerns About GOES–R and Similarities to NPOESS ...................................
New Technologies and Increasing Costs ............................................................
Contractors Role in the GOES–R Project ...........................................................
Data Continuity ....................................................................................................

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher,  Jr.  (Ret.),  Under  Secretary  of  Com-
merce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-
ministration ..........................................................................................................

(III)

8
10

10
11

12
13

14

14

15
17
21

22
24

37
37
39
39
40
41
42
43
44

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Mr.  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management  Issues,
Government Accountability Office ......................................................................

Page

57

IV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

GAO  REPORT  ON  NOAA’S  WEATHER

SATELLITE  PROGRAM

FRIDAY,  SEPTEMBER  29,  2006

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:03  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Sherwood  L.
Boehlert [Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

GAO Report on NOAA’s

Weather Satellite Program

FRIDAY, SEPTEMBER 29, 2006

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

On  September  29,  2006  at  10:00  a.m.,  the  House  Science  Committee  will  hold  a
hearing  about  the  status  of  a  critical  weather  satellite  program,  the  National  Oce-
anic and Atmospheric Administration’s (NOAA) Geostationary Operational Environ-
mental  Satellite  (GOES)  system.  NOAA  is  beginning  the  process  of  purchasing  the
next generation of the GOES system, which has been designated GOES–R. Cost es-
timates for the system have escalated, and NOAA has already announced the elimi-
nation  of  one  new  sensor  that  was  to  be  part  of  the  satellite.  The  Government  Ac-
countability  Office  (GAO)  recently  completed  a  report  about  GOES–R,  ‘‘Geo-
stationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incorporating
Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Satellite  Programs.’’  The  GAO  report  will  be  officially
released  at  the  hearing.  (An  embargoed  copy  of  the  Executive  Summary  of  the  re-
port is attached as Appendix I.)

Geostationary  satellites  maintain  a  fixed  position  above  the  Earth  and  provide  a
constant  view  of  weather  conditions.  NOAA  operates  a  two-satellite  geostationary
system  to  provide  continuous  and  complete  coverage  of  the  continental  Unites
States.  This  system  provides  vital  real-time  data  for  NOAA’s  weather  forecasting
and warning operations.

Government  satellite  programs  have  a  history  of  technical  problems  and  major
cost  overruns.  Most  recently,  NOAA  and  its  government  partners  (the  Department
of  Defense  and  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration)  have  experi-
enced  massive  cost  overruns  on  another  weather  satellite  program,  the  National
Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite System (NPOESS). In June, gov-
ernment  officials  testified  to  the  Science  Committee  that  the  NPOESS  program
needs to be completely restructured, resulting in delays, higher costs, and more lim-
ited capabilities than were originally planned for the satellite.

The  GOES–R  program  is  at  a  much  earlier  stage  than  NPOESS  is  at  this  point.
NOAA  has  nearly  completed  the  preliminary  design  of  GOES–R.  The  GOES–R  sat-
ellite  series  is  intended  to  maintain  the  continuity  of  weather  forecasting  data
through 2028 and provide the first major technical advance in geostationary instru-
mentation  since  1994.  Original  estimates  for  GOES–R  placed  the  total  cost  at  $6.2
billion,  but  as  of  May  2006  the  program  office  estimated  costs  could  be  as  high  as
$11.4 billion. In an effort to lessen these costs, NOAA is currently looking at options
to reduce the scope and capabilities of GOES–R.

The GAO report, requested by the Committee, examines the status of the GOES–
R  program  and  reasons  for  the  cost  increases  and  problems  to  date,  and  identifies
program management actions NOAA should take to ensure past problems with sat-
ellite  programs  are  not  repeated  with  GOES–R.  GAO  identified  four  major  lessons
from previous satellite programs and found that, while NOAA has some plans to ad-
dress  those  lessons,  actions  remain  for  NOAA  to  fully  implement  the  lessons  and
decrease the risk of future cost overruns and technical problems.
Witnesses:
Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher  (ret.),  Administrator,  National  Oceanic
and Atmospheric Administration
Mr.  David  Powner,  Director  of  Information  Technology  Management  Issues,  U.S.
Government Accountability Office

Background About GOES–R

The GOES–R satellites are designed to maintain a fixed position at high altitude
above  the  Earth  and  provide  a  constant  view  of  weather  conditions  in  the  United

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

States.  They  orbit  at  the  same  speed  as  the  Earth  rotates,  and  so  appear  to  hover
above a set position on the ground. They complement other weather satellites (polar-
orbiting satellites) that circle the Earth at low altitude and provide global coverage
of  weather  and  climate  conditions.  NOAA  has  flown  geostationary  satellites  since
1970.

GOES–R  satellites  are  being  built  to  carry  instruments,  or  sensors,  to  measure
a  number  of  atmospheric  features  important  to  real-time  detection  and  tracking  of
severe weather such as thunderstorms and hurricanes. GOES satellites are also im-
portant  for  NOAA’s  daily  and  hourly  weather  forecasts.  Original  plans  for  GOES–
R  included  four  satellites,  each  carrying  five  sensors,  described  in  detail  below.
GOES–R  will  be  the  first  major  technical  upgrade  for  NOAA’s  geostationary  sat-
ellites  since  1994.  (New  GOES  satellites  have  been  launched  since  1994,  but  they
have not been more advanced than their predecessors.)
Originally Planned GOES–R Sensors

Original plans for GOES–R, developed in 2003, included three sensors for weather
forecasting  and  two  for  detecting  solar  flares  that  can  interfere  with  communica-
tions  and  other  electrical  systems.  The  key  sensors  for  weather  data  are  the  Ad-
vanced  Baseline  Imager  (ABI)  and  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite  (HES).
ABI  will  provide  images  of  the  Earth’s  surface,  atmosphere  and  cloud  cover  that
help  track  severe  weather  and  support  regular  weather  forecasts.  ABI  will  provide
higher  resolution  and  faster  coverage  than  the  current  capabilities.  For  example,
current  GOES  satellites  provide  updated  pictures  every  25  minutes  and  ABI  is  to
provide updated images every five minutes.

HES  was  supposed  to  provide  significantly  advanced  ‘‘sounder’’  information  com-
pared  to  capabilities  on  current  satellites.  Sounders  like  HES  provide  three-dimen-
sional vertical profiles of atmospheric temperature and humidity. These profiles are
fundamental  information  for  the  computer  models  used  to  provide  daily  weather
forecasts.  Original  GOES–R  plans  also  called  for  HES  to  provide  images  of  coastal
waters to help scientists monitor events like harmful algal blooms or assist in fish-
eries management.

Earlier  this  month,  NOAA  decided  HES  was  too  complicated  and  the  technology
was  not  mature  enough  to  include  it  on  GOES–R.  NOAA  is  currently  examining
other options to provide sounder capabilities on GOES–R.

The third weather forecasting sensor on GOES–R will be the Geostationary Light-
ning  Mapper  (GLM).  In  the  past,  the  government  has  flown  lightning  mappers  on
polar-satellites  for  research  purposes,  but  GOES–R  will  be  the  first  time  the  U.S.
flies a lightning mapper on a geostationary satellite for operational purposes. NOAA
expects that the GLM will provide improved capabilities for tracking thunderstorms
and severe weather events.

The other two sensors planned for GOES–R are the Space Environmental In-Situ
Suite (SEISS) and the Solar Imaging Suite (SIS). Together these sensors will detect
solar  storms  and  track  dangerous  solar  flares  that  come  towards  the  Earth.  NOAA
forecasts  and  warns  about  solar  storms  because  the  storms  can:  cause  damage  to
communication  satellites,  electric  transmission  lines  and  electric  transformers;
interfere in ground-based communications with airline pilots; be fatal to astronauts
on  space  flights  and  in  the  International  Space  Station;  and  potentially  harm  air-
plane passengers flying polar routes.
GOES–R Management, Timeline, and Budget

GOES–R is the first time NOAA is taking on primary responsibility for managing
the  procurement  of  a  major  weather  satellite.  In  the  past,  NOAA  relied  on  NASA
to  procure  and  launch  the  GOES  satellites.  For  GOES–R,  NOAA  is  responsible  for
the overall satellite, while NASA will assist in procuring individual instruments.

NOAA  expects  the  current  GOES  satellites  to  last  at  least  until  2016.  Current
plans for GOES–R will launch the first satellite in 2014, leaving two years for cali-
brating the new satellite before it needs to be fully operational. This timeline is con-
sistent  with  how  NOAA  typically  schedules  geostationary  satellite  launches  and
calibration.

NOAA  began  internal  design  of  and  planning  for  GOES–R  in  2003.  In  October
2005,  NOAA  awarded  three  contracts  for  the  preliminary  design  phase  of  GOES–
R. During this phase of the program, the three private contractors develop detailed
technical,  schedule  and  cost  plans  for  the  overall  GOES–R  system  based  on  the
original  design  described  above.  The  preliminary  design  phase  ends  in  December
2006.  Based  on  work  performed  during  the  preliminary  design  phase,  NOAA  will
issue  a  Request  for  Proposals  for  system  acquisition  and  operations  and  then  will
make a final decision on the prime contractor for GOES–R.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

However, results thus far from the preliminary design phase indicate that NOAA
underestimated the cost and technical complexity of the GOES–R satellites and sen-
sors.  The  original  cost  for  a  series  consisting  of  four  satellites  and  five  sensors  was
estimated  at  $6.2  billion.  However,  more  recent  and  more  detailed  cost  estimates
indicate  that  costs  would  be  close  to  $12  billion.  Also,  based  on  preliminary  design
work, NOAA decided earlier this month that HES was too complicated and the tech-
nology was not mature enough to include it on GOES–R. Given the rising cost esti-
mates  and  technical  challenges,  NOAA  is  currently  examining  options  for  scaling
back  the  GOES–R  program.  NOAA  is  looking  at  options  that  include  building  only
two satellites, and removing HES and providing less advanced sounder capabilities.
Originally,  NOAA  planned  to  select  the  prime  contractor  by  July  2007.  The  proc-

ess of re-designing the satellite will delay that selection until May 2008.

In addition to selecting a prime contractor, NOAA will also issue contracts for the
individual sensors on GOES–R. NOAA has already selected a contractor for building
ABI  and  for  SEISS,  and  expects  to  select  the  contractor  for  SIS  in  spring  2007.  By
starting  work  on  key  sensors  now,  NOAA  hopes  to  allow  plenty  of  time  to  mitigate
any technical problems that may occur while developing the equipment.
Lessons Learned from Past Problems with Government Satellites

Government  satellite  programs  have  a  history  of  technical  problems  and  major
cost overruns. GAO examined four major satellite procurement programs and identi-
fied  key  lessons  learned  from  those  procurements  that  it  recommends  NOAA  apply
to the GOES–R procurement.
Lesson #1: Establish Realistic Cost and Schedule Estimates

Many  experts  have  found  that  satellite  acquisition  programs  tend  to  produce  un-
realistically low cost and schedule estimates. Contractors have incentive to come in
with low estimates to make their bids more competitive, and agencies have incentive
to  produce  low  estimates  to  make  the  programs  appealing  to  budget  reviewers  and
the Congress.

For GOES–R, NOAA has commissioned three costs estimates (one by GOES–R of-
ficials,  one  by  NOAA’s  budget  office,  and  one  by  an  independent  cost  estimating
group),  but  currently  has  no  firm  plans  for  how  to  reconcile  the  government  and
independent life-cycle cost estimates once the program requirements are completed.
Thus, GAO recommends NOAA establish a formal process for objectively evaluating
and  reconciling  the  government  and  independent  life  cycle  cost  estimates  for  the
program.
Lesson  #2:  Ensure  Sufficient  Technical  Readiness  of  the  System’s  Components  Prior

to Key Decisions

Satellite  programs  are  technically  complex  and  often  experience  problems  as
equipment is being built. To mitigate the technical risk, managers establish key de-
cision points to make sure the technology meets certain requirements before moving
on  in  the  program.  However,  in  past  programs  adequate  requirements  were  not  al-
ways established for key decision points. For example, for the most problematic sen-
sor in the NPOESS program (VIIRS), a key decision point known as the critical de-
sign  review  proceeded  with  officials  reviewing  only  a  paper  design  for  the  sensor.
Most  experts  agree  that  normally  a  critical  design  review  should  include  building
a model unit, not just reviewing designs on paper.

NOAA  has  performed  preliminary  studies  of  some  of  the  GOES–R  technologies
but GAO recommends much more extensive reviews by technical experts before sen-
sors  go  into  production.  In  particular,  GAO  is  concerned  about  the  Advanced  Base-
line  Imager  (ABI).  ABI  is  similar  to  VIIRS  and  is  based  on  the  same  legacy  NASA
sensor  (MODIS).  ABI  will  cost  $360  million  and  has  already  experienced  technical
problems that led to cost overruns of $6 million, so far. GAO projects those overruns
could  reach  as  high  as  $23  million  if  NOAA  does  not  put  in  place  more  rigorous
technical and management review milestones for ABI.
Lesson #3: Provide Sufficient Management at Government- and Contractor-Levels

Another  problem  systemic  in  satellite  procurement  is  poor  management.  On  the
government  side,  this  can  mean  inadequate  expertise  in  systems  engineering  and
project management, inappropriate contractor award fees, inadequate reserve funds,
and lack of close oversight of the contractor.

For  GOES–R,  NOAA  plans  to  increase  the  number  of  resident  systems  engineers
and  project  management  experts  and  to  place  government  staff  at  each  of  the  con-
tractors’  locations  to  more  closely  oversee  day-to-day  program  management.  Addi-
tionally, NOAA intends to structure the award fee process for GOES–R in a manner
consistent  with  recommendations  from  a  recent  report  by  the  Department  of  Com-
merce Inspector General and other experts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

The  GAO  report  commends  NOAA  for  the  management  action  taken  to  date,  but
points  out  that,  especially  since  GOES–R  marks  the  first  time  NOAA  is  taking  on
a major satellite acquisition by itself, NOAA may need more technical experts than
it currently plans to hire.
Lesson  #4:  Perform  Adequate  Senior  Executive  Oversight  to  Ensure  Mission  Success
Timely and informed decisions from senior officials are vital to successful satellite
programs.  GAO  and  others  have  stated  that  the  lack  of  timely  decisions  by  senior
management  in  the  NPOESS  was  a  major  factor  in  the  large  cost  overruns  and
schedule  delays  for  that  program.  With  GOES–R,  NOAA  has  established  a  council
of  high-level  officials  who  meet  monthly  to  review  the  program.  GAO  recommends
that  this  council  closely  review  the  results  of  all  preliminary  studies  and  inde-
pendent assessments of the program.
Witness Questions:

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony.
Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher  (ret.),  Administrator,  National  Oceanic  and

Atmospheric Administration
1. What  new  processes  for  satellite  procurement  has  NOAA  implemented  as  a
result of lessons learned from previous programs, such as the National Polar-
orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite System?

2. Do  you  agree  with  the  following  recommendations  from  the  Government  Ac-
countability Office (GAO)’s report, ‘‘Geostationary Operational Environmental
Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incorporating  Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Sat-
ellite Programs?’’

a. Develop  a  process  to  evaluate  and  reconcile  the  independent  and  pro-

gram cost estimates once final program decisions are made.

b. Develop  a  process  to  validate  the  level  of  technical  maturity  and  con-
tractor  management  procedures  achieved  on  the  Advanced  Baseline
Imager prior to critical design reviews.

c. Determine the appropriate level of resources needed to adequately track

and oversee the GOES–R program.

d. Ensure  that  the  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  reviews  all  pre-
liminary  studies  and  independent  assessments  on  technical  maturity  of
the system and its components so that an informed decision can be made
about  the  level  of  technical  complexity  it  is  taking  on  when  proceeding
past key decision milestones.

3. What  specific  steps  have  you  taken  and  will  you  take  to  address  each  of

GAO’s recommendations listed in question two?

Mr. David Powner, Director of Information Technology Management Issues, Govern-

ment Accountability Office
1. Please outline the major findings and recommendations of your report, ‘‘Geo-
stationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incor-
porating Lessons Learned from Other Satellite Programs.’’

2. Given its current schedule and procedures, what are the greatest risks facing

the GOES–R program as it moves ahead?

3. What information should Congress and the public have to ensure the GOES–

R program remains on track?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix I: Executive Summary from GAO Report

7

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman BOEHLERT. The hearing will come to order. Just let me
outline  what  we  expect  this  morning.  We  will  probably  just  get
through  a  couple  of  opening  statements,  mine  and  Mr.  Gordon’s,
and  then  the  bells  will  ring.  So  it  is  going  to  be  a  hectic  morning,
and Admiral and Mr. Powner, you understand how this place oper-
ates,  and  this  is  the  getaway  day.  It  may  be  30  hours  in  length,
but in any event it is going to be a rather hectic day, so with your
indulgence we will try to proceed in an orderly manner. The Speak-
er  doesn’t  really  accede  to  our  wishes  all  the  time,  and  we  would
go forward without any interruption.

This  may  well  be  the  last  hearing  for  me  as  Chairman,  and  for
the  Committee  in  this  session  because  we  are  due  to  complete  our
business today and then go off back to the districts and then come
back  for  what  is  affectionately  referred  to  as  a  lame  duck  session,
and  so  we  are  unlikely  to  have  hearings  then.  But  I  want  to  take
the privilege of the Chair at the last hearing to thank our very ca-
pable  professional  staff  led  by  the  Chief  of  Staff,  Mr.  David
Goldston,  and  Mr.  Chuck  Atkins,  the  Chief  of  Staff  for  the  minor-
ity. These guys and their entire team have been absolutely magnifi-
cent.

And I think, Admiral, you would have to acknowledge that while
they  are  persistent  in  their  probing  but  they  are  just  so  profes-
sional in their daily conduct, and I think all of us owe them a debt
of  gratitude.  And  then  I  am  sorry  that  it  is  so  hectic  because  usu-
ally  we  have  a  full  complement  here,  but  we  don’t  today  because
everybody  is  scattered  to  the  wind  and  doing  a  lot  of  last  minute
things  before  departing  the  Nation’s  Capitol.  But  I  want  to  say  to
Mr. Gordon, I could not have had a better partner in this endeavor,
and  I  think  this  Science  Committee  has  done  itself  proud.  And  I
am  fond  of  saying,  and  many  of  you  have  heard  me  say  this,  that
when  legislation  is  reported  out  of  this  committee,  and  significant
legislations  has  year  after  year,  I  take  pride  in  saying  the  finger-
prints of just about everybody is all over the legislation.

We listen to our Democrat colleagues. We don’t always agree but
we  always  listen  and  we  always  have  a  dialogue,  and  so  I  couldn’t
be prouder than I am as I begin to take leave from this institution
of  their  performance  of  all  Members  of  this  committee,  Republican
and Democrat alike. Mr. Gordon, I thank you.

Mr.  GORDON.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  you  would,  just  allow  me  just  a
moment.  As  usual,  I  often  times  concur  with  your  remarks,  and  I
once  again  concur  with  them  today,  but  also  to  let  you  know  that
there  was  a  rumor  that  this  meeting  called  on  the  last  day  of  our
session was potentially an attempt to continue the goodbye tour for
additional  accolades,  and  I  am  sure  this  goodbye  tour  is  not  going
to be over with any time soon but you will be less staffed.

And  so  what  I  wanted  to  do,  I  am  glad  that  Mary  Ann  is  here
today because I know she is going to be staffing the Sherry’s good-
bye  tour,  and  this  is  for  the  road  staff.  So  if  you  would  take  that
over to Mary Ann, we would appreciate that.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  thank  you  for
acknowledging my bride who is, I tell everyone, my biggest booster
and most constructive critic. Ladies and gentlemen, let me proudly
present  the  First  Lady  of  the  Science  Committee.  Mary  Ann,  you
are  being  introduced.  Thank  you  very  much.  With  that,  let  us  get

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

right  on  to  the  business  as  is  the  usual  in  this  committee.  I  want
to welcome everyone here for what may very well be the final hear-
ing  of  my  tenure,  and  we  picked  a  vital  and  future-looking  subject
for this hearing, the procurement of the next generation of weather
satellites known as GOES–R.

As  I  think  everyone  knows,  our  past  hearings  on  weather  sat-
ellites have not been very happy occasions for everybody. The polar
satellite program, NPOESS, was entirely to use a description of one
of  my  grandsons,  out  of  whack,  over  budget,  behind  schedule,  los-
ing capability, and, quite honestly, we have to concede grossly mis-
management,  and  there  is  shared  blame  all  the  way  around.  One
reason  the  NPOESS  program  got  that  way  was  inadequate  over-
sight,  and  that  includes  inadequate  oversight  by  the  leadership  at
the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration,  and  inad-
equate  oversight  by  those  of  us  who  have  the  responsibility  in  the
Congress.

In  the  case  of  NPOESS,  we  are  now  getting  monthly  updates
from NOAA, and I hope the Committee will have periodic hearings
to  keep  the  NPOESS  procurement  process  transparent,  the  public
informed,  and  the  agency  and  its  contractors  on  its  toes.  And  now
early  on  in  the  procurement  process,  we  are  going  to  inaugurate
that  same  open  continued  oversight  approach  for  GOES–R.  This
should  be  the  first  of  many  hearings  on  this  critical  weather  sat-
ellite  program.  The  GOES–R  hearings  ought  to  go  better  than
NPOESS  hearings  have  so  far.  I  am  happy  to  say  that  it  now  ap-
pears  that  NOAA  has  indeed  been  learning  from  past  mistakes,
and I want to compliment Admiral Lautenbacher for that, his open-
ness,  his  willingness  to  interact  with  us,  his  providing  of  vital  in-
formation so that we can assess it in a timely fashion.

With  GOES–R,  NOAA  is  trying  to  evaluate  its  technology  as-
sumptions  early  and  trying  not  to  overreach.  NOAA  has  put  to-
gether  stellar  independent  cost  review  teams  and  what  looks  like
an  appropriate  senior  management  team.  Once  again,  congratula-
tions. Neither of these steps was taken in the case of NPOESS, and
NOAA  is  taking  action  now  for  GOES–R  precisely  to  avoid  repeat-
ing  past  mistakes  and  that  is  reassuring.  At  the  same  time,  there
are some red flags already for us. The budget estimates for GOES–
R are already close to doubling. Now this is very early in the proc-
ess  exactly  when  NOAA  can  make  design  changes  to  control  costs
in  the  end  but  still  it  is  not  comforting  that  the  estimates  were  so
far off so early.

Also, NOAA is already dropping an advanced sensor. Again, this
in  many  ways  might  be  a  good  thing.  Untried,  problematic  tech-
nology shouldn’t be used on operational satellites but it means that
GOES–R may represent much less of a technical advance than had
been  hoped.  So  one  of  our  tasks  today  is  to  get  a  clear  fix  on  the
current  status  of  GOES–R,  its  cost  and  capabilities,  with  the  un-
derstanding  that  this  information  will  continue  to  change.  But  our
most  important  task  is  to  set  up  a  system  of  congressional  over-
sight.  That  is  our  responsibility,  and,  quite  frankly,  we  have  not
measured up to the task in the past with respect to NPOESS, and
we must concede that.

We have got to make sure that NOAA has set up a system of in-
ternal  oversight  to  prevent  future  problems.  The  very  helpful  Gov-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

ernment  Accountability  Office  study  that  is  being  released  today
should  guide  NOAA  and  this  committee  as  we  insure  that  NOAA
has  taken  all  the  steps  necessary  to  increase  the  chances  of  suc-
cess, and as we determine what information Congress and the pub-
lic  need  as  the  project  moves  ahead.  The  data  from  weather  sat-
ellites  have  become  features  of  our  every  day  lives  and  they  help
protect  life  and  property,  but  we  need  to  be  sure  that  we  are  get-
ting  the  best  satellite  feasible  for  the  lowest  possible  cost.  That  is
our  responsibility.  That  requires  constant  vigilance  and  today  we
start that oversight. Mr. Gordon.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Boehlert follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN SHERWOOD L. BOEHLERT

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  here  for  what  may  very  well  be  the  final  hearing  of
my  tenure.  And  we  picked  a  vital  and  future-looking  subject  for  this  hearing—the
procurement of the next generation of weather satellites, known as GOES–R.

As I think everyone knows, our past hearings on weather satellites have not been
very  happy  occasions  for  anybody.  The  polar  satellite  program,  NPOESS,  was  en-
tirely out of whack—over budget, behind schedule, losing capability and grossly mis-
managed.

One  reason  the  NPOESS  program  got  that  way  was  inadequate  oversight—and
that  includes  inadequate  oversight  by  the  leadership  at  the  National  Oceanic  and
Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) and inadequate oversight by us. We are asking
NOAA to learn from its mistakes, and we’re going to try to do the same.

In  the  case  of  NPOESS,  we  are  now  getting  monthly  updates  from  NOAA,  and
I hope the Committee will have periodic hearings to keep the NPOESS procurement
process transparent, the public informed and the agency and its contractors on their
toes. And now, early on in the procurement process, we are going to inaugurate that
same  open,  continual  oversight  approach  for  GOES–R.  This  should  be  the  first  of
many hearings on this critical weather satellite program.

The  GOES–R  hearings  ought  to  go  better  than  NPOESS  hearings  have  so  far.  I
am happy to say that it appears that NOAA has indeed been learning from its mis-
takes, and I want to compliment Admiral Lautenbacher for that.

With  GOES–R,  NOAA  is  trying  to  evaluate  its  technology  assumptions  early  and
not  overreach.  NOAA  has  put  together  stellar  independent  cost  review  teams  and
what looks like an appropriate senior management team. Neither of these steps was
taken  in  the  case  of  NPOESS,  and  NOAA  is  taking  action  now  for  GOES–R  pre-
cisely to avoid repeating past mistakes. That’s reassuring.

At  the  same  time,  there  are  some  red  flags  already  for  us.  The  budget  estimates
for  GOES–R  are  already  close  to  doubling.  Now,  this  is  very  early  in  the  process—
exactly when NOAA can make design changes to control costs in the end. But still,
it’s not comforting that the estimates were so far off so early. Also, NOAA is already
dropping  an  advanced  sensor.  Again,  this  is  in  many  ways  a  good  thing—untried,
problematic  technology  shouldn’t  be  used  on  operational  satellites.  But  it  means
that  GOES–R  may  represent  much  less  of  a  technological  advance  than  had  been
hoped.

So  one  of  our  tasks  today  is  to  get  a  clear  fix  on  the  current  status  of  GOES–
R—its  costs  and  capabilities—with  the  understanding  that  that  information  will
continue  to  change.  But  our  more  important  task  is  to  set  up  a  system  of  Congres-
sional oversight and to make sure that NOAA has set up a system of internal over-
sight to prevent future problems.

The  very  helpful  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  study  that  is  being  re-
leased at today’s hearing should guide NOAA and this committee as we ensure that
NOAA  has  taken  all  the  steps  necessary  to  increase  the  chances  of  success,  and  as
we  determine  what  information  Congress  and  the  public  need  as  the  project  moves
ahead.

The data from weather satellites have become features of our everyday lives, and
they help protect life and property. But we need to be sure that we are getting the
best satellites feasible for the lowest cost possible. That requires constant vigilance,
and today we start that oversight.

Mr. Gordon.
Mr. GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. As usual, you have well
set  forth  that  this  morning’s  hearing  is  to  hear  testimony  on

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

NOAA’s  plans  to  require  the  next  series  of  Geostationary  Environ-
mental  Satellites,  a  series  known  as  GOES–R.  The  satellite  pic-
tures  are  a  familiar  site  to  anyone  viewing  a  weather  forecast.
These  satellites  are  essential  to  monitoring  the  development  of  se-
vere storms. Whenever a hurricane is threatening our coastal areas
it  is  the  GOES  image  that  we  see  the  eye  and  the  rotating  clouds
of the storm. We simply must insure continuity of this satellite in-
formation to maintain our ability to accurately forecast this weath-
er.

We  are  still  at  a  very  early  stage  of  this  program.  We  have  an
opportunity  to  take  steps  to  avoid  problems  with  this  acquisition
such  as  the  problems  you  put  forth  and  that  we  experienced  with
the  polar  satellite  procurement  or  NPOESS.  We  simply  cannot  af-
ford  to  repeat  the  mistakes  of  the  polar  program.  The  Administra-
tion has taken initial steps to obtain realistic cost estimates and to
determine  the  degree  of  technical  difficulty  associated  with  the
planned sensors for this system. The Administration has also taken
steps  to  hire  technical  experts  and  to  establish  an  executive  over-
sight committee for this program.

I  commend  you,  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  for  these  actions.  How-
ever, Mr. Powner of the Government Accountability Office will tes-
tify  this  morning  additional  steps  must  be  taken  to  limit  risk  of
cost and schedule overruns. We expect to see a realistic cost assess-
ment  for  this  program  before  the  system  contract  is  awarded.  We
expect a realistic assessment of the technical challenges associated
with  the  development  of  the  sensors  and  adequate  reserves  to  be
able—or be put aside to deal with the problems that will inevitably
arise.

Finally,  we  expect  the  Executive  Committee  overseeing  this  pro-
gram to pay attention to its development and to act decisively and
expeditiously  when  problems  are  identified.  Again,  I  would  like  to
thank Mr. Powner and members of the GAO team for his fine work
and  assistance  to  the  Committee  in  our  oversight  of  NOAA’s  sat-
ellite programs. The Committee will continue to watch the develop-
ment of this program closely over the next few years. I hope we can
work cooperatively to achieve our common goal of delivering impor-
tant and improved weather forecasting information. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE BART GORDON

We are here this morning to hear testimony on NOAA’s plans to acquire the next

series of geostationary environmental satellites—the series known as GOES–R.

The  GOES  satellite  pictures  are  a  familiar  sight  to  anyone  viewing  a  weather
forecast.  These  satellites  are  essential  to  monitoring  the  development  of  severe
storms.  Whenever  a  hurricane  is  threatening  our  coastal  areas,  it  is  the  GOES  im-
ages that we see of the eye and the rotating clouds of the storm.

We  simply  must  ensure  continuity  of  this  satellite  information  to  maintain  our

ability to accurately forecast the weather.

We are still at a very early stage of this program. We have an opportunity to take
steps  to  avoid  problems  with  this  acquisition  such  as  the  problems  we  are  experi-
encing  with  the  polar  satellite  procurement—NPOESS.  We  simply  cannot  afford  to
repeat the mistakes of the polar program.

The  Administration  has  taken  initial  steps  to  obtain  realistic  cost  estimates  and
to  determine  the  degree  of  technical  difficulty  associated  with  the  planned  sensors
for  this  system.  The  Administration  has  also  taken  steps  to  hire  technical  experts
and to establish an executive oversight committee for this program.

I commend you, Admiral Lautenbacher, for these actions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

However,  as  David  Powner  of  the  Government  Accountability  Office  will  testify
this  morning,  additional  steps  must  be  taken  to  limit  risks  of  cost  and  schedule
overruns.

We  expect  to  see  a  realistic  cost  estimate  for  this  program  before  a  system  con-
tract is awarded. We expect a realistic assessment of the technical challenges associ-
ated  with  the  development  of  the  sensors  and  adequate  reserves  to  be  put  aside  to
deal with the problems that will inevitably arise.

Finally, we expect the Executive Committee overseeing this program to pay atten-
tion  to  its  development  and  to  act  decisively  and  expeditiously  when  problems  are
identified.

I  would  like  to  thank  David  Powner  and  the  member  of  his  GAO  team  for  their
fine work and assistance to the Committee in our oversight of NOAA’s satellite pro-
grams.  The  Committee  will  continue  to  watch  the  development  of  this  program
closely  over  the  next  few  years.  I  hope  we  can  work  cooperatively  to  achieve  our
common goal of delivering improved weather forecasting to the Nation.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Now for the distinguished Chairman of the

Subcommittee, Dr. Ehlers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  very  pleased  that
the Committee is holding this hearing today on another of the Na-
tion’s critical weather satellite programs, the next generation of the
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration’s  Geostationary
Operational Environmental Satellite, known as GOES–R. But first,
Mr. Chairman, on this occasion of your presumably last hearing as
Chair,  I  want  to  thank  you  from  the  bottom  of  my  heart  for  the
incomparable  leadership  you  have  given  this  committee.  Your  un-
wavering support for science and technology has warmed the cock-
les  of  my  scientific  heart,  and  with  your  easy  manner  and  open-
minded  approach  to  every  issue  you  tackle,  you  have  served  this
committee,  this  Congress,  and  the  American  people  well,  and  I
thank you for it.

The  fact  that  the  last  hearing  of  Chairman  Boehlert’s  tenure  is
on this satellite program should help us focus our attention on the
importance of GOES–R, and how seriously we need to take our role
in ensuring its success. NOAA has operated geostationary weather
satellites since the 1970s. It is not hyperbole to say that these sat-
ellites  save  lives,  many  lives.  They  help  the  National  Weather
Service  to  better  understand  and  monitor  severe  weather  events
such  as  tornadoes  and  hurricanes  and  of  course  the  resultant
floods, and they are critical to the timely delivery of the alerts and
warnings that lead people to safety before disaster strikes.

I  am  frequently  reminded  of  my  childhood  in  Minnesota  where
we  had  the  storms,  we  called  them  cyclones  at  that  time,  but  the
tornadoes,  the  storms,  came  up  unexpectedly.  The  only  warning
was  to  look  at  the  sky  and  see  what  was  happening.  We  had  a
number  of  lives  lost  in  the  communities  I  have  lived  in  simply  be-
cause  there  was  no  warning  system.  People  had  to  use  their  own
eyes and ears and often could not reach shelter in time. Today, we
don’t  have.  The  ongoing  problems  with  other  satellite  programs
have made it clear that we in Congress must take our oversight re-
sponsibilities  seriously.  Failure  to  do  so  can  cost  our  communities
dearly.  Therefore,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  what  the  Government
Accountability  Office  will  tell  us  about  the  state  of  GOES–R  and
how  NOAA  is  applying  lessons  to  learn  from  past  satellite  pro-
grams.

I  also  look  forward  to  hearing  from  NOAA  about  what  they  see
as the biggest challenges to the success of GOES–R, and, most im-
portantly, how they will address these challenges. I am particularly

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

concerned about how NOAA will move the program forward in light
of the recent cancellation of HES, the Hyperspectral Environmental
Suite.  The  way  NOAA  fills  the  gap  left  by  this  instrument  will  af-
fect how our nation observes and forecasts weather for the next two
decades, so it is critical that we get this right.

I  believe  that  NOAA  is  earnest.  They  are  trying  to  get  this  pro-
gram  right  and  I  applaud  their  efforts.  However,  good  intentions
are not enough. We all have to work on this together. I expect this
hearing to be the beginning of an ongoing dialogue with NOAA, the
GAO,  and  our  committee  as  we  all  work  together  as  one  to  ensure
the  success  of  this  important  program.  I  thank  out  witnesses  for
being  here.  I  would  love  to  stay.  Unfortunately,  I  have  to  go  and
dedicate  the  new  botanic  garden  with  Ms.  Bush,  but  I  will  return
as soon as I can, and perhaps I could even persuade to come along
and enjoy the rest of the hearing with us.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Thank you Chairman Boehlert. I am pleased the Committee is holding this hear-
ing  today  on  another  of  this  nation’s  critical  weather  satellite  programs:  the  next
generation of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration’s Geostationary
Operational Environmental Satellite, known as GOES–R.

But  first,  on  the  occasion  of  his  last  hearing  as  Chair,  I  thank  my  friend,  Sherry
Boehlert, for his incomparable leadership of our committee. His unwavering support
for  science  and  technology,  along  with  his  easy  manner  and  open-minded  approach
to  every  issue  he  tackles,  has  served  this  committee,  this  Congress,  and  the  Amer-
ican people well.

The  fact  that  the  last  hearing  of  Chairman  Boehlert’s  tenure  is  on  this  satellite
program  should  help  focus  our  attention  on  the  importance  of  GOES–R,  and  how
seriously we need to take our role in ensuring its success. NOAA has operated geo-
stationary  weather  satellites  since  the  1970’s.  It  is  not  hyperbole  to  say  these  sat-
ellites save lives—they help the National Weather Service to better understand and
monitor severe weather events such as tornadoes and hurricanes and are critical to
the timely delivery of the alerts and warnings that lead people to safety before dis-
aster strikes.

The  ongoing  problems  with  other  satellite  programs  have  made  it  clear  that  we
in  Congress  must  take  our  oversight  responsibilities  seriously—failure  to  do  so  can
cost our communities dearly. Therefore, I look forward to hearing what the Govern-
ment  Accountability  Office  will  tell  us  today  about  the  state  of  GOES–R,  and  how
NOAA is applying lessons learned from past satellite programs. I also look forward
to hearing from NOAA about what they see as the biggest challenges to the success
of  GOES–R,  and—most  importantly—how  they  will  address  those  challenges.  I  am
particularly  concerned  about  how  NOAA  will  move  the  program  forward  in  light  of
the  recent  cancellation  of  HES,  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite.  The  way
NOAA  fills  the  gap  left  by  this  instrument  will  affect  how  our  nation  observes  and
forecasts  weather  for  the  next  two  decades,  so  it  is  critical  that  we  get  this  right.
I  believe  that  NOAA  is  earnest—they  are  trying  to  get  this  program  right  and  I
applaud  their  efforts  so  far.  However,  good  intentions  are  not  enough.  I  expect  this
hearing  to  be  the  beginning  of  an  ongoing  dialogue  between  NOAA,  the  GAO,  and
our committee as we all work to ensure the success of this important program.

I  thank  our  excellent  witnesses  for  being  here,  and  I  yield  back  the  balance  of

my time.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. Ehlers, don’t go too far. We are advised
that  in  five  to  seven  minutes  a  vote  will  start  on  the  Floor,  so  we
are  going  to  get  right  to  the  opening  statements.  Before  doing  so,
I want to acknowledge something that is going to happen. The Na-
tion  has  been  well  served  by  a  very  distinguished  government  em-
ployee,  Max  Mayfield,  who  at  the  end  of  this  year  has  announced
his intention to retire. He is the Director of the National Hurricane
Center in Miami, one of the true stars in the otherwise sorry saga

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

of  Hurricane  Katrina.  Just  an  absolutely  able,  committed,  profes-
sional  public  servant.  And,  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  you  know  how
good he is. And very dependent on weather satellites.

And my wife reports to me, and she knows, that he is also a mat-
inee  idol  because  all  over  America  during  Hurricane  Katrina  the
TV sets were on and people were glued to it, and the most credible
information  came  from  this  dedicated  and  able  guy,  and  we  thank
him. With that, Admiral, you are up.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Wu follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE DAVID WU

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for calling this hearing today.
The  GOES  program  has  provided  us  with  vital  weather  forecasting  information
for the past four decades. The last significant technological improvements to GOES
were  adopted  in  1994.  It  is  reasonable  to  expect  that  we  could  consider  expanding
our capabilities for an expected launch of the GOES–R series in 2012.

We  all  realize  that  increased  capabilities  come  at  a  price—in  the  case  of  satellite
systems  at  a  significant  price.  I  am  in  agreement  with  Ranking  Member  Gordon
that  we  must  have  realistic  cost  estimates  and  technology  assessments  of  any  up-
graded  sensor  capabilities  so  that  we  can  make  an  informed  judgment  about  how
much  technological  improvement  we  need  and  can  afford.  Expanded  technological
capabilities  require  not  only  improvements  to  satellite  instrumentation,  but  ex-
panded ground systems and data management and analytical capabilities to get full
value for our money.

In all of these considerations, continuity of service must be the top priority.
I encourage you, Admiral Lautenbacher, to heed the recommendations included in
the  GAO  report  we  are  releasing  today.  I  also  encourage  you  to  maintain  open,
frank communication with this committee as the program moves forward.

Mr. Powner, I would also like to express my thanks to you and your team for this
report  and  for  the  other  fine  work  you  have  done  for  us  on  NOAA’s  satellite  pro-
grams.

I  thank  the  witnesses  for  appearing  before  us  today  and  I  look  forward  to  your

testimony.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Good morning. I want to thank the witnesses for appearing before our committee
to  discuss  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)’s  next
generation  Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  Program,  known  as
GOES–R.

Since the 1960s, NOAA has operated geostationary satellites that provide images
and  data  on  atmospheric,  oceanic,  and  climatic  conditions  over  the  continental
United  States  and  Hawaii.  These  satellites  are  best  known  for  creating  the  hurri-
cane  pictures  you  see  on  television  and  the  data  to  help  forecast  the  weather.  Pro-
viding  our  communities  with  accurate  and  timely  information  to  predict  and  track
weather and natural disasters is critical to our economic security and national safe-
ty.

This  past  summer,  my  congressional  district  suffered  from  severe  thunderstorms
and rain, causing damage and destruction throughout our communities. I know how
beneficial weather forecasts and warnings to help communities prepare for a natural
disaster.  However,  these  predictions  are  not  perfect  and  there  are  instances  when
the scale and magnitude of some storms are not accurate. I am pleased NOAA con-
tinues to take steps to implement lessons learned from past satellite programs, and
acknowledges that more remains to be done.

Today’s  hearing  focuses  on  NOAA’s  plan  for  the  GOES–R  program  to  replace  the
current series of satellites before they reach the end of their usefulness by approxi-
mately  2012.  Chairman  Boehlert  and  Ranking  Member  Gordon  requested  the  Gov-
ernment  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  to  determine  the  status  of  and  plans  for  the
GOES–R series procurement and identify and evaluate the actions that the program
management  team  is  taking  to  ensure  that  past  problems  experienced  in  procuring
other satellite programs are not repeated.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  GAO  on  its  findings  and  recommendations  to  the

Secretary of Commerce. Thank you Mr. Chairman.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

STATEMENT  OF  VICE  ADMIRAL  CONRAD  C.  LAUTENBACHER,
JR. (RET.), UNDER SECRETARY OF COMMERCE FOR OCEANS
AND ATMOSPHERE, NATIONAL OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC
ADMINISTRATION
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Thank you very much. Chairman Boeh-
lert, Ranking Member Gordon, distinguished Members of the Com-
mittee and staff, I appreciate the opportunity to engage in a discus-
sion of GOES–R and to report on our progress. Before I start talk-
ing about the satellite programs, allow me to express my apprecia-
tion to the Chairman for his leadership and his conduct of hearings
and  oversight  of  NOAA  in  the  past  during  his  tenure.  We  have
gone  through  the  tenure  together.  At  the  time  that  I  started  was
about the time when I started with CORE. Chairman Boehlert was
coming on line. I appreciate the truly bipartisan nature of the hear-
ings  and  the  interest  in  our  programs,  and  I  appreciate  your  lead-
ership.  On  behalf  of  all  of  NOAA,  we  thank  you  for  your  interest
in our programs and their value to the country.

I  also  want  to  thank  Chairman  Ehlers  before  he  goes  to  the  bo-
tanical  gardens.  His  personal  leadership  allowed  the  passing  of  a
NOAA  Organic  Act  on  the  House  floor,  truly  a  historic  occasion.
Congressmen  have  been  trying  for  years  to  do  that,  and  we  thank
you. As the Committee knows if there is any one piece of legislation
that  I  believe  would  help  us  to  manage  better  and  to  release  and
unleash  the  power  of  the  NOAA  concept  is  an  Organic  Act  agreed
to by Congress. So thank you very much. We appreciate your lead-
ership.  You  have  been  a  great  inspiration  to  those  of  us  in  the
agency.

Because  of  the  bipartisan  nature  and  because  I  really  believe
this,  I  want  to  thank  Congressman  Gordon  and  Congressman  Wu
as  well  for  the  partnership  because  if  you  didn’t  care  about  these
programs  they  wouldn’t  get  any  air  time  at  all,  so  I  am  very
pleased  to  be  here  with  you  and  to  discuss  these  and  have  the  fu-
ture  laid  out  and  work  on  the  best  solution  for  the  country,  so
thank you.

As mentioned in the opening statements, the Committee is famil-
iar  with  the  NPOESS  program.  We  have  had  several  hearings  on
it. This is a discussion on the next generation Geostationary Oper-
ational Environmental Satellite Program. It is called GOES–R. We
name them by letters as they—before they are launched, and when
they  are  launched  and  successful  they  become  numbers  so  if  you
hear  the  numbers  when  they  are  in  orbit  they  become  numbers.
These  satellites,  remember,  are  geo  positioned.  They  are  23,000
miles  above  the  equator.  We  have  two  of  them  that  are  constantly
looking  at  the  Atlantic  and  the  Pacific,  and  they  do  give  you  these
spectacular  pictures  that  you  see  of  hurricanes.  They  also  help  us
to provide information for forecasts and warnings for severe weath-
er,  as  mentioned,  such  as  thunderstorms  and  beginning  of  the
fronts that can create tornadoes and that sort of thing.

Now we are in the early stages of the acquisition process for the
next  generation  of  GOES  satellites  called  GOES–R.  So  we  are
about  five  years  ahead  of  where  we  were  on  NPOESS,  and  this  is
the  opportunity  that  we  have  to  have  this  discussion  at  this  point
to  define  the  system  to  make  sure  it  is  the  best  possible  system
technologically  for  the  cost  and  the  money  that  the  Nation  is  will-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

ing  to  pay  for  it  so  I  appreciate  this  opportunity.  We  have  made
significant  changes  to  our  GOES–R  program  management,  as  I
hope to demonstrate as I go through here. Because of the direction
from  this  committee,  the  reviews  from  the  GAO,  and  the  DOC  in-
spector  general,  the  reason  recent  Nunn-McCurdy  certification
process and our own internal reviews.

We have made those changes not because of today’s hearing nec-
essarily  but  because  we  believe  they  are  right,  and  we  have  been
doing  them  for  the  past  several  years  as  the  lessons  have  been
coming out. We have been modifying our approach to GOES–R and
trying  to  incorporate  in  a  very  timely  manner  the  right  way,  the
best way, to manage these programs for the future. Should I stop?
Go ahead? All right.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Go right ahead.
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  There  are  bells  ringing,  and  just  to
make  sure.  Some  of  the  changes  that  we  have  made  include  the
creation  of  a  NOAA  program  management  council.  This  is  some-
thing that NOAA has not had before. This is to back stop our nor-
mal  chain  of  command  process,  which  I  am  sure  you  are  aware  of,
but this is a senior management council. It is made up of our sen-
ior  NOAA  personnel,  the  leaders  that  are  responsible  for  cost,
schedule  and  performance  technically  budgetarily  and  administra-
tively.  It  also  includes  NASA  experts  who  meet.  They  come,  we
meet—have  this  council  meet  monthly  to  review  this  program.  We
have  also  created  a  group  of  users  of  satellite  data,  a  broad-based
group, which developed the initial recommendation for the require-
ments  and  they  also  meet  regularly  to  assess  the  preliminary  de-
sign.

My deputy and I meet regularly to discuss the recommendations
from  these  two  groups,  and  we  make  decisions  based  on  these  rec-
ommendations.  We  provide  the  Department  of  Commerce  with
quarterly  briefings  on  the  program,  and  I  brief  the  Deputy  Sec-
retary  and  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  as  needed.  In  fact,  there  is
a schedule to brief them very shortly on the current status. We are
using  the  full  capabilities  and  processes  at  NASA  for  the  develop-
ment of the GOES–R system, including their independent technical
and  engineering  reviews,  and  also  NASA  will  manage  the  sensor
contracts.  We  have  hired  teams  of  independent  satellite  experts
and  independent  cost  estimators  to  provide  periodic  reviews  and
address the concerns raised by NOAA senior leadership.

We  have  also  hired  a  highly  competent  and  respected  former
NASA  program  manager  for  the  GOES–R  program.  The  program
office is increasing staff to support robust systems engineering and
oversight  of  the  contractors,  which  will  include  on  site  representa-
tives  at  the  contractor  and  major  subcontractors.  Presently,  we
have  three  contractor  teams  developing  preliminary  designs  and
identifying  program  risks.  When  they  are  finished,  NOAA  and  the
Department  of  Commerce  will  decide  on  a  system  design  and
award a contract. Our three contractor teams and our independent
review  team  have  provided  feedback  on  preliminary  design  con-
cepts, and they are three in nature.

First of all, to realize and actually build this concept that we had
been  working  on  for  GOES–R  would  be  much  more  expensive  and
much  riskier  than  we  had  first  thought.  Number  two,  one  of  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

proposed  sensors  of  the  five  that  are  on  this—projected  to  be  on
this  satellite,  the  HES  or  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite,  is
not  technically  mature  enough  that  would  impact  the  spacecraft,
the  ground  systems,  and  it  would  jeopardize  a  launch  in  2014,
which  is  the  right  time  to  launch  for  continued  continuity.  And,
third  of  all,  based  on  our  conversations  with  GAO  and  our  contin-
ued internal review, we can make further improvements in the way
the acquisition will be managed, and we are doing so.

We  are  revising  our  plans  to  insure  we  have  a  program  that
maintains data continuity, allows for technical advances, and is af-
fordable. Regarding the cost, preliminary cost estimates, and there
were rough cost estimates that were created before we had full re-
quirements in line, increased from a number of roughly $6.2 billion
to  a  potential  of  $11.4  billion,  learned  from  these  studies  that  the
contractors are doing for us. Most of this increase in required budg-
et was because we revised inflation assumptions in our cost models.
Cost  models  at  inflation  which  was  well  out  of  date,  that  is  about
$2.6  billion  of  the  increase  as  inflation  changes.  The  revised  esti-
mate  also  would  provide  for  $800  million  for  increased  manage-
ment  reserves  based  on  expert  recommendations  and  lessons
learned from NPOESS.

In addition, the cost of the spacecraft ground system and sensors
from  the  technological  complexity  increased  by  about  $1.5  billion.
That  was  the  rough  orders  of  magnitude  of  the  issues  that  we  are
tacking at this point. In response to those increased cost estimates,
the program office assembled a team of experts to develop multiple
program  options  to  reduce  cost  and  risk  and  to  look  at  a  optimal
solution.  The  team  provided  information  to  the  program  manage-
ment  council  and  the  user  group,  which  examined  the  option  and
provided  me  with  recommendations.  We  are  still  in  that  process
but to date the following items have been accomplished.

While  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Sensor  potentially  could
have  provided  a  major  improvement  in  our  ability  to  characterize
the  atmosphere  and  the  coastal  environment  we  have  decided  not
to  award  a  contract  to  build  the  HES  sensor  at  this  time  for  this
satellite.  It  does  not  mean  we  are  giving  up  on  HES.  It  means  we
are  deferring  it  and  trying  to  build  the  proper  technological  base
before it can be instituted and put on an operational satellite.
[The prepared statement of Admiral Lautenbacher follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR.

Introduction

Chairman  Boehlert,  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I
am  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher,  Under  Secretary  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere  at  the
Department of Commerce (DOC) and head of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration (NOAA).

Before  I  talk  about  satellites,  I  would  like  to  thank  Chairman  Boehlert  for  his
thoughtful  leadership  and  friendship  over  the  past  several  years.  I  truly  appreciate
the bipartisan manner in which you conduct the Science Committee and your strong
support  for  NOAA.  You  and  your  staff  have  been  good  to  work  with—always  thor-
ough  and  fair.  We  will  miss  your  leadership  and  wish  you  the  best  in  retirement.
I  also  want  to  thank  Chairman  Ehlers  who,  although  he  is  not  retiring,  will  no
longer  be  our  Subcommittee  Chairman  in  the  next  Congress.  Chairman  Ehlers  has
invested  a  considerable  amount  of  time  and  effort  into  learning  our  issues  and  be-
come quite an expert on our agency. I personally appreciate your leadership and ef-
forts  to  pass  a  NOAA  Organic  Act.  By  passing  the  Organic  Act  on  the  House  Floor
last  week,  you  accomplished  something  many  Members  had  tried  and  failed  to  do

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

over the last 20 years. It was a testament to your dedication and your abilities, and
I thank you.
What are geostationary satellites?

While the Committee is familiar with NOAA’s next generation polar-orbiting envi-
ronmental  satellite  program  (NPOESS),  I  am  here  to  discuss  NOAA’s  next  genera-
tion Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellite Program, known as GOES–
R.  NOAA  has  operated  geostationary  satellites  since  the  1970s.  These  satellites—
located  more  than  22,000  miles  above  the  equator—provide  images  and  data  on  at-
mospheric,  oceanic,  and  climatic  conditions  over  the  continental  United  States  and
Hawaii. These satellites are best known for creating the hurricane pictures you see
on  television,  but  they  also  provide  data  to  help  forecast  the  weather  and  provide
warnings  for  severe  weather  such  as  thunderstorms.  We  operate  two  geostationary
satellites,  one  over  the  east  coast  and  the  other  over  the  west  coast.  To  protect
against  a  loss  of  satellite  coverage,  we  maintain  a  spare  satellite  on-orbit  that  can
be repositioned to take the place of a failed satellite.
What is GOES–R?

The final two GOES satellites in the current GOES–N series have been built. We
are  in  the  early  stages  of  the  acquisition  process  for  the  next  generation  of  GOES
satellites,  called  GOES–R.  Given  the  long  lead  time  needed  for  satellite  develop-
ment, acquisition work is required now to ensure continuity of satellite coverage.

At first, we envisioned GOES–R as a satellite series that would contain significant
technological advancements. We looked at ways to expand the use of GOES data for
other NOAA missions, such as ocean and coastal observations that support fisheries
management and marine research. The 2003 preliminary system design concept was
for a combination of the five sensors to be flown on as many as eight satellites. The
preliminary cost estimate of $6.2 billion identified in the GAO report was developed
in  2004  and  presented  in  the  FY  2006  President’s  Budget.  This  figure  has  been  re-
vised over time as the program has moved forward.

The  five  sensors  included  an  advanced  imager,  a  hyperspectral  suite,  two  solar
weather  sensors,  and  a  lightning  mapper.  The  Advanced  Baseline  Imager  (or  A–B–
I) is the main sensor which fulfills NOAA’s critical mission requirements. This sen-
sor will provide significant advancements over current GOES imagers by taking pic-
tures five times faster and have the ability to zoom in to view specific severe weath-
er events, while at the same time continue to look at the rest of the United States.
We currently do not have this capability and must constantly make decisions about
what  to  focus  on,  which  impacts  our  ability  to  forecast  weather.  The  Hyperspectral
Environmental  Suite  (HES)  was  conceived  as  an  advanced  sounder  and  coastal
water imager that would provide a profile of atmospheric temperature and moisture
content used in weather forecasting and take images of coastal areas for water qual-
ity  monitoring  and  coastal  hazard  assessment.  The  Solar  Imaging  Suite  (SIS)  will
provide pictures of the sun to detect solar flares, while the Space Environmental in-
Situ  Suite  (SEISS)  will  measure  the  space  radiation  environment.  The  Geo-
stationary Lightning Mapper (GLM) will help us better detect lightning and improve
our capabilities to forecast and track severe weather.

The planned launch readiness date—based on the projected life expectancy of cur-
rent satellites and the requirement to preserve continuity of the imaging mission—
was  projected  to  be  in  2012.  NOAA  reevaluates  the  need  date  for  GOES–R  based
on  the  performance  of  the  operational  satellites;  this  analysis  has  led  to  revisions
of the GOES–R launch date. Continuing analyses of our current satellites indicates
that  the  on-orbit  GOES  satellites  are  lasting  longer  than  predicted  and  a  2014
launch readiness date is now warranted.

As  noted  earlier,  GOES–R  is  still  in  the  design  phase  and  we  have  yet  to  award
a  prime  contract  for  acquisition  of  this  satellite  series.  Presently,  three  contractor
teams  are  developing  preliminary  designs  and  identifying  program  risks,  and  when
they  are  finished,  NOAA  and  the  Department  of  Commerce  will  decide  on  the  sys-
tem  design  and  award  a  contract.  The  ABI  instrument  is  under  contract  and  being
developed,  and  the  contract  for  development  of  the  SEISS  instrument  was  just
signed.  NASA  is  managing  all  of  our  sensor  contracts  and  is  providing  technical
guidance and support for the whole program.
Lessons Learned from NPOESS and Other Reviews

NOAA  is  applying  lessons  learned  from  the  NPOESS  program  and  other  recent
reviews of space systems. We are implementing these lessons into our management
and  acquisition  strategy.  We  have  made  significant  changes  to  our  GOES–R  pro-
gram  management  and  oversight  based  on  direction  from  this  committee,  reviews
from  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO),  the  DOC  Inspector  General,  the
recent NPOESS Nunn-McCurdy certification process, and our own internal reviews.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

I  created  a  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  chaired  by  my  Deputy,  which
is  made  up  of  senior  NOAA  and  NASA  personnel  and  meets  monthly  to  review  the
program. This group assesses the technical, budget, and schedule performance of the
program. It reviews proposed new activities and/or changes in scope of the program
to ensure risk and budget impacts to existing programs are understood and realistic.
This group provides recommendations on whether the program should move forward
at  all  major  milestones,  such  as  contract  award,  critical  design  reviews,  test  readi-
ness  reviews  and  launch  readiness.  The  PMC  can  also  recommend  alternative  ac-
tions including terminations. During these monthly meetings members openly ques-
tion  the  program  director  and  can  request  further  information  or  actions  the  pro-
gram office must fulfill. Each meeting begins with a review of any open action item.
In  addition,  I  have  a  group  consisting  of  the  NOAA  users  of  the  satellite  data,
which  also  reports  to  my  Deputy.  As  we  designed  the  original  concept  for  GOES–
R,  the  user  group  developed  the  initial  requirements  and  meets  regularly  to  assess
the  extent  to  which  the  preliminary  designs  meet  the  requirements.  This  group  is
critical  as  we  move  forward  with  finalizing  sensors  and  the  satellite  system  to  en-
sure GOES–R will meet NOAA’s requirements for data and products.

As  both  of  the  groups  report  to  my  Deputy,  it  is  his  job  to  arbitrate  any  dif-
ferences  of  opinions  between  the  two  groups.  My  Deputy  and  I  meet  regularly  to
discuss  the  recommendations  from  the  groups  and  I  make  decisions  based  on  these
recommendations. We provide the Department of Commerce with quarterly briefings
on the program and I brief the Deputy Secretary and Secretary as needed.

We  have  co-located  the  GOES–R  program  office  at  NASA  Goddard  Space  Flight
Center  and  are  using  the  full  capabilities  and  processes  at  NASA  for  the  develop-
ment of the GOES–R system. This includes NASA’s processes for independent tech-
nical  and  engineering  reviews.  The  program  reports  on  a  monthly  basis  to  a  NASA
Program Management Council which is chaired by the Goddard Deputy Director.

We  hired  a  team  of  independent  satellite  experts  to  provide  periodic  reviews  and
address specific concerns raised by NOAA senior leadership. We also hired two cost
estimating  teams  to  independently  develop  the  program  estimates.  One  will  work
for the GOES–R program office and develop the Program Office Estimate. The other
cost  estimating  team  works  for  the  NOAA  Chief  Financial  Officer,  who  reports  to
my  Deputy,  to  provide  an  Independent  Cost  Estimate.  Our  goal  is  to  ensure  that
the program will have a realistic and executable budget in place that provides suffi-
cient  reserves  to  handle  development  issues  that  arise.  NOAA  also  hired  a  highly
competent  and  respected  former  NASA  program  manager,  Anthony  Comberiate,  for
the  GOES–R  program.  The  GOES–R  program  has  increased  staff  to  support  robust
systems  engineering  and  oversight  of  the  contractors,  including  on-site  representa-
tives at the prime contractors and at major subcontractors.
What did we learn about GOES–R?

As  we  proceed  through  the  preliminary  design  phase,  our  three  contractor  teams
and  our  Independent  Review  Team  have  provided  feedback  on  our  design  concepts:
1. To  actually  build  our  concept  for  GOES–R  would  be  much  more  expensive

and riskier than we first thought;

2. One  of  the  proposed  sensors,  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite  (HES)
is  not  technologically  mature  enough,  would  impact  the  spacecraft  and  the
ground systems, and would not allow us to launch in 2014; and

3. Further improvements could be made in the way the acquisition will be man-

aged.

Based on this information we are revising our plans to ensure we have a program
that maintains data continuity, allows for technical advances, and is affordable. The
good  news  is  that  this  is  the  right  time  to  make  changes  to  the  plans—before  we
let a contract to build the satellites.
Why have the cost estimates increased so much?

The  preliminary  cost  estimates  to  build  this  new  system  went  from  $6.2  billion
to  around  $11.4  billion.  Most  of  the  increase  was  because  we  revised  the  inflation
assumptions in our cost models, which added about $2.6 billion to the total. The es-
timates  were  also  revised  to  provide  for  increased  management  reserves/margins
based  on  expert  recommendations  and  lessons  learned  from  NPOESS.  This  added
an  additional  $800  million.  The  cost  of  spacecraft,  ground  system  and  sensors  in-
creased about $1.5 billion. The remaining increase covers the launch, operation and
support  segments  of  GOES–R.  This  increase  in  the  life  cycle  cost  estimate  reflects
new inputs from NASA and others.

In  response  to  the  increasing  cost  estimates  for  the  program,  the  program  office
assembled a team of cost and technical experts and developed multiple program op-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

tions  to  reduce  cost  and  risk.  The  team  provided  information  to  the  PMC  and  the
user  group,  which  examined  the  options  and  provided  me  with  recommendations.
These  recommendations  are  being  considered  and  decisions  will  be  incorporated  in
the FY 2008 President’s Budget.
Why not build HES?

One  decision  we  have  made  is  not  to  award  a  contract  to  build  the  HES  sensor
given its risks and technological challenges. HES is a large and complex instrument.
The  combination  of  instrument  development  challenges,  magnitude  of  required
spacecraft  accommodations,  and  ground  product  implications,  provided  a  high  level
of  risk.  Given  input  from  the  Program  Management  Council,  input  from  the  pro-
gram office, the contractor and the independent review team, I determined HES cre-
ated too much risk for the GOES–R program. While HES potentially could have pro-
vided  a  major  improvement  in  our  ability  to  characterize  the  atmosphere  and  the
coastal  environment,  we  did  not  think  it  was  prudent  to  accept  that  much  risk  in
an  operational  satellite  for  an  acquisition  program.  We  are  examining  alternate
ways  to  maintain  today’s  sounding  capability  for  GOES–R.  While  not  including  the
HES  on  GOES–R  we  are  going  to  complete  the  HES  preliminary  design  and  risk
reduction  work  that  is  currently  under  contract.  This  work  will  be  of  value  to  the
user  group  which  is  actively  working  this  issue  with  the  program  office  as  I  have
also  asked  the  program  office  to  look  at  alternatives  to  add  a  HES-like  instrument
on research satellites or future GOES satellites. Fulfilling the coastal waters compo-
nent of the sounder capability remains a NOAA priority. NOAA has initiated a sep-
arate  analysis  of  alternatives  to  examine  possible  future  approaches  for  providing
hyperspectral sounding and coastal waters imaging.

In  addition  to  architectural  changes,  we  have  decided  to  provide  the  sensors  to
the  prime  contractor  as  Government  Furnished  Equipment.  This  will  ensure  more
direct  Government  oversight  of  these  critical  developments  allowing  the  prime  con-
tractor  to  focus  on  the  spacecraft,  ground  system,  and  integration.  We  are  also  ex-
amining  the  division  of  labor  between  NOAA  and  NASA.  In  the  past,  NOAA  has
provided the funding and NASA managed the contract for NOAA. We are discussing
with  NASA  whether  this  model  is  the  most  appropriate  one  for  the  GOES–R  Pro-
gram.
The GAO Report

We  have  also  provided  information  to  the  GAO  about  GOES–R,  which  is  why  we
are here today. I am pleased the GAO report recognizes we continue to incorporate
the lessons learned from problems of other satellite programs into the GOES–R pro-
curement. I realize more remains to be done and I am committed to doing it.

Specifically, the GAO provided three recommendations:

Recommendation number one: Once the scope of the program has been finalized,
establish  a  process  for  objectively  evaluating  and  reconciling  the  government  and
independent life cycle cost estimates.

We  will  establish  a  process  to  reconcile  the  cost  estimates,  and  I  will  ensure  this
process  is  reviewed  by  our  Independent  Review  Team.  We  will  examine  how  NASA
and  the  Department  of  Defense  reconcile  cost  estimates  and  tailor  a  process  that
is most appropriate for NOAA.
Recommendation number two: Perform  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  Advanced
Baseline Imaginer Sensor (called A–B–I) before it enters production.

The  report  highlights  the  problems  the  contractor  is  experiencing  with  ABI,  the
one  sensor  in  actual  development.  This  sensor  fulfills  our  mission  critical  imaging
requirements.  NOAA  and  NASA  are  working  closely  to  ensure  performance  of  the
instrument  meets  these  requirements.  We  believe  we  understand  the  current  tech-
nical  problems  and  the  contractor  has  a  realistic  plan  to  develop  the  sensor.  Given
the  importance  of  this  instrument  and  lessons  learned  from  the  NPOESS  Visible/
Infrared  Imager/Radiometer  Suite  (VIIRS)  sensor,  I  agree  with  GAO  that  we  need
to  ensure  we  are  technologically  ready  to  move  forward  through  the  critical  mile-
stones  of  development  and  production.  NASA  has  several  reviews  of  the  sensor
planned  by  government  experts  outside  of  the  program,  and  NOAA  will  have  inde-
pendent  experts  regularly  assess  the  progress  of  the  sensor  development  at  critical
phases  along  with  reviews  by  the  NOAA  PMC.  GAO  was  also  concerned  about  the
potential  for  ABI  cost  overruns  and  schedule  delays.  We  agree  with  GAO  and  we
have budgeted for additional cost and schedule contingencies in line with GAO esti-
mates to cover these challenges. We believe these actions will ensure the sensor will
be ready to fly in 2014.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

Recommendation  number  three:  Seek  assistance  from  an  independent  review
team  to  determine  the  appropriate  level  of  people  and  resources  needed  to  track  and
oversee the contractor’s performance using specific metrics.

We agree with GAO about the importance of monitoring critical metrics that help
illuminate the cost and schedule performance of the contractors. NOAA is hiring at
least three additional people to aid in the implementation of Earned Value Manage-
ment program management. As the program grows, we will adjust accordingly while
seeking  input  and  advice  from  NASA  experts  and  our  Independent  Review  Team.
What are NOAA’s next steps?

Given  the  analysis  that  our  preliminary  concepts  for  GOES–R  are  significantly
riskier  and  more  expensive  than  previously  thought  and  would  likely  not  be  ready
for  a  2014  launch,  NOAA  and  DOC  are  reevaluating  the  GOES–R  program.  As  we
evaluate  and  attempt  to  balance  cost,  schedule,  risk,  and  performance,  our  number
one priority is to ensure continuity of existing imagery data.

We  are  providing  the  three  contractor  teams  developing  the  preliminary  designs
for  GOES–R  three  additional  months.  We  want  them  to  refine  their  designs  by  re-
moving  the  HES  sensor  and  providing  at  least  existing  sounding  capability.  We  in-
structed  them  to  develop  a  system  that  will  have  the  remaining  four  sensor  suites
on  each  satellite,  thus  reducing  the  minimum  number  of  satellites  needed  from
three to two. We expect to have the preliminary design proposals at the end of this
year.  Then  the  program  office,  the  PMC  and  the  user  group  will  provide  me  with
recommendations  on  the  final  design  for  GOES–R,  which  will  include  the  cost,
schedule,  performance  and  risk  for  the  program.  I  will  then  provide  my  rec-
ommendations to the Secretary who will decide whether to move forward with a con-
tract.  It  will  then  be  about  one  year  to  develop  and  award  a  contract,  which  would
occur in the summer of 2008.
Conclusion

As  I  have  said  before,  satellites  are  very  complicated  and  difficult  machines  to
build.  But,  their  capabilities  are  critical  to  NOAA’s  mission  to  predict  the  Earth’s
environment. I believe we are making significant strides in developing a better proc-
ess for designing and acquiring our satellites. My goal is to have a process in place
that  will  provide  my  successors  with  the  best  information  to  make  the  best  deci-
sions.

Once  again,  I  appreciate  the  efforts  of  the  Committee,  in  particular  Chairman
Boehlert, in working with us as we develop this process. I would be happy to answer
any questions you may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR.

A native of Philadelphia, Pa., retired Navy Vice Admiral Conrad C. Lautenbacher,
Ph.D., is serving as the undersecretary of commerce for oceans and atmosphere. He
was  appointed  Dec.  19,  2001.  Along  with  this  title  comes  the  added  distinction  of
serving  as  the  eighth  Administrator  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-
ministration. He holds an M.S. and Ph.D. from Harvard University in applied math-
ematics.

Lautenbacher  oversees  the  day-to-day  functions  of  NOAA,  as  well  as  laying  out
its  strategic  and  operational  future.  The  agency  manages  an  annual  budget  of  $4
billion.  The  agency  includes,  and  is  comprised  of,  the  National  Environmental  Sat-
ellite,  Data  and  Information  Services;  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service;  National
Ocean  Service;  National  Weather  Service;  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research;  Ma-
rine and Aviation Operations; and the NOAA Corps, the Nation’s seventh uniformed
service. He directed an extensive review and reorganization of the NOAA corporate
structure to meet the environmental challenges of the 21st century.

As  the  NOAA  Administrator,  Lautenbacher  spearheaded  the  first-ever  Earth  Ob-
servation Summit, which hosted ministerial-level representation from several dozen
of  the  world’s  nations  in  Washington  July  2003.  Through  subsequent  international
summits  and  working  groups,  he  worked  to  encourage  world  scientific  and  policy
leaders to work toward a common goal of building a sustained Global Earth Obser-
vation  System  of  Systems  (GEOSS)  that  would  collect  and  disseminate  data,  infor-
mation and models to stakeholders and decision makers for the benefit of all nations
individually  and  the  world  community  collectively.  The  effort  culminated  in  an
agreement for a 10-year implementation plan for GEOSS reached by the 55 member
countries  of  the  Group  on  Earth  Observations  at  the  Third  Observation  Summit
held in Brussels February 2005.

He also has headed numerous delegations at international governmental summits
and conferences around the world, including the U.S. delegation to 2002 Asia-Pacific

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

Economic  Cooperation  Ocean  Ministerial  Meeting  in  Korea,  and  2002  and  2003
meetings  of  the  World  Meteorological  Organization  and  Intergovernmental  Oceano-
graphic  Commission  in  Switzerland  and  France,  as  well  as  leading  the  Commerce
delegation to the 2002 World Summit on Sustainable Development in South Africa.
Before joining NOAA, Lautenbacher formed his own management consultant busi-
ness,  and  worked  principally  for  Technology,  Strategies  &  Alliances  Inc.  He  was
president  and  CEO  of  the  Consortium  for  Oceanographic  Research  and  Education
(CORE).  This  not-for-profit  organization  has  a  membership  of  76  institutions  of
higher learning and a mission to increase basic knowledge and public support across
the spectrum of ocean sciences.

Lautenbacher  is  a  graduate  of  the  U.S.  Naval  Academy  (Class  of  1964),  and  has
won  accolades  for  his  performance  in  a  broad  range  of  operational,  command  and
staff  positions  both  ashore  and  afloat.  He  retired  after  40  years  of  service  in  the
Navy. His military career was marked by skilled fiscal management and significant
improvements in operations through performance-based evaluations of processes.

During  his  time  in  the  Navy,  he  was  selected  as  a  Federal  Executive  Fellow  and
served  at  the  Brookings  Institution.  He  served  as  a  guest  lecturer  on  numerous  oc-
casions at the Naval War College, the Army War College, the Air War College, The
Fletcher  School  of  Diplomacy,  and  the  components  of  the  National  Defense  Univer-
sity.

His  Navy  experience  includes  tours  as  Commanding  Officer  of  USS  HEWITT
(DD–966),  Commander  Naval  Station  Norfolk;  Commander  of  Cruiser-Destroyer
Group  Five  with  additional  duties  as  Commander  U.S.  Naval  Forces  Central  Com-
mand  Riyadh  during  Operations  Desert  Shield  and  Desert  Storm,  where  he  was  in
charge of Navy planning and participation in the air campaign. As Commander U.S.
Third Fleet, he introduced joint training to the Pacific with the initiation of the first
West Coast Joint Task Force Training Exercises (JTFEXs).

A  leader  in  the  introduction  of  cutting-edge  information  technology,  he  pioneered
the  use  of  information  technology  to  mount  large-scale  operations  using  sea-based
command and control. As Assistant for Strategy with the Chief of Naval Operations
Executive  Panel,  and  Program  Planning  Branch  Head  in  the  Navy  Program  Plan-
ning  Directorate,  he  continued  to  hone  his  analytic  skills  resulting  in  designation
as  a  specialist  both  in  Operations  Analysis  and  Financial  Management.  During  his
final tour of duty, he served as Deputy Chief of Naval Operations (Resources, War-
fare Requirements and Assessments) in charge of Navy programs and budget.

Lautenbacher  lives  in  Northern  Virginia  with  his  wife  Susan  who  is  a  life-long

high school and middle school science teacher.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Admiral,  under  the  circumstances  that  is
a good place to stop. And I applaud that last statement, and all of
your  statement.  Here  is  what  we  plan  to  do.  We  are  going  to  give
Mr.  Powner  an  opportunity  for  his  full  five-minute  statement,  and
then  we  are  going  to  recess,  go  over  and  answer  the  call  at  the
House.  There  are  two  votes.  We  should  be  back  in  about  20  min-
utes or so, and then we will have some limited questioning because
we have your full statements. And we have the open dialogue back
and  forth  and  so  we  will  follow  it  up  with  that  open  dialogue  and
some written questions. Mr. Powner.

STATEMENT OF MR. DAVID A. POWNER, DIRECTOR, INFORMA-
TION  TECHNOLOGY  MANAGEMENT  ISSUES,  GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE
Mr.  POWNER.  Chairman  Boehlert,  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  and
Members  of  the  Committee,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  tes-
tify this morning on our GOES–R report completed at your request.
The  next  generation  of  geostationary  environmental  satellites  is
critical for future weather forecasting and tracking severe weather.
NOAA  is  currently  early  in  the  acquisition  cycle  as  the  prime  con-
tract  is  expected  to  be  awarded  in  2008.  Your  early  oversight,  Mr.
Chairman,  has  been  essential  to  insure  that  NOAA  is  establishing
a management team and processes that will help to avoid repeating

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

the  problems  recently  experienced  on  NPOESS  and  other  major
satellite acquisition

Today,  as  requested,  I  will  summarize  three  key  points  starting
with  the  current  cost  and  schedule  estimate  of  GOES–R,  lessons
learned  from  previous  satellite  acquisitions  and  recommendations
going  forward.  GOES–R  acquisition  is  the  fourth  series  of  GOES
satellites  that  have  been  acquired  since  1970.  As  originally
planned,  this  acquisition  is  to  consist  of  four  satellites  that  would
each contain five sensors that are expected to significantly increase
the  amount  and  precision  of  environmental  data.  NOAA  has  three
vendors  currently  working  on  preliminary  designs  and  plans  to
award a contract to one of them in May, 2008.

NASA  is  responsible  for  the  sensors  having  awarded  final  con-
tracts  on  two  of  the  five  and  preliminary  design  contracts  on  the
remaining  three.  The  first  GOES–R  satellite  is  expected  to  be
launched in 2014, and the final one is to provide coverage through
2028.  Regarding  costs,  Mr.  Chairman,  when  we  began  our  review
for  you  the  life  cycle  cost  was  reported  at  6.2  for  four  satellites.
During our review, we learned that the cost could be in the $11 bil-
lion  to  $12  billion  range,  double  the  original  estimate.  We  con-
cluded  our  review  last  month  with  the  future  scope  and  direction
in  limbo,  and  a  commitment  from  NOAA  that  a  decision  would  be
made  by  the  end  of  this  month.  NOAA  last  week  told  us  that  the
GOES–R  life  cycle  cost  could  be  close  to  the  original  $6.2  billion
range,  but  now  it  only  includes  two  satellites,  and  we  dropped  one
of the technically complex sensors, HES.

Although  the  cost  per  satellite  is  not  good  news,  NOAA’s  early
attention  to  reducing  this  acquisition’s  technical  complexity  and
more  fully  understanding  its  requirements  prior  to  awarding  the
prime  contract  is.  Our  review  also  showed  that  NOAA’s  manage-
ment  team  is  taking  into  consideration  key  lessons  learned  from
the  recent  NPOESS  and  prior  GOES  experiences,  but  that  even
more  attention  to  past  problems  is  needed.  Past  problems  experi-
enced  with  these  acquisitions  include  poor  cost  and  schedule  esti-
mates,  technical  complexity  that  exceeds  the  contractors’  and  gov-
ernment’s  abilities  to  deliver,  insufficient  contract  oversight,  and
ineffective executive involvement.

NOAA  has  established  plans  to  address  many  of  the  past  prob-
lems  that  focus  on  conducting  independent  cost  estimates,  per-
forming  preliminary  studies  of  key  technologies,  placing  resident
government  offices  at  key  contractor  locations  and  establishing  a
senior  executive  oversight  committee.  However,  additional  actions
are  needed  to  better  position  NOAA  for  success.  We  made  a  num-
ber of recommendations to address these actions that include estab-
lishing processes to insure that NOAA has an accurate independent
life cycle estimate, performing a comprehensive review of one of the
critical sensors to fully understand the level of technical complexity
and having an independent review team assess the adequacy of key
resources needed to oversee the contractor’s performance.

In  summary,  Mr.  Chairman,  NOAA’s  attention  to  requirements
and  this  acquisition’s  technical  complexity  prior  to  contract  award
is  commendable  but  recent  direction  still  leaves  our  government
with  an  extremely  costly  and  complex  acquisition  that  is  essential
for our nation’s warning and forecasting operations through nearly

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

2030.  Key  risks  facing  this  program  include  obtaining  an  accurate
cost  estimate  and  realistic  schedule,  balancing  the  pressure  to  in-
crease  the  level  of  technical  complexity  to  advance  science  with
budget realities and the need to control costs and schedules, secur-
ing  adequate  systems  engineering  expertise  to  oversee  contractor
performance, and having early and frequent executive level involve-
ment  that  holds  both  contractor  and  government  personnel  ac-
countable.

There  is  also  additional  risk  in  that  NOAA  is  for  the  first  time
responsible  for  managing  a  satellite  acquisition  instead  of  NASA.
Given  this,  it  will  be  important  to  leverage  NASA’s  expertise  and
to  aggressively  and  continuously  manage  the  risks  that  always
seem to plague these large satellite acquisitions. This concludes my
statement.  Chairman  Boehlert,  thank  you  for  your  many  years  of
service to our nation.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Powner follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID A. POWNER

GEOSTATIONARY OPERATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL

SATELLITES

ADDITIONAL ACTION NEEDED TO INCORPORATE LESSONS LEARNED FROM OTHER

SATELLITE PROGRAMS

Why GAO Did This Study

The  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  plans  to  procure
the next generation of geostationary operational environmental satellites, called the
Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites-R  series  (GOES–R).  This  new
series  is  considered  critical  to  the  United  States’  ability  to  maintain  the  continuity
of data required for weather forecasting through the year 2028.

GAO was asked to summarize and update its report previously issued to the Sub-
committee on Environment, Technology, and Standards—Geostationary Operational
Environmental  Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incorporating  Lessons  Learned  from
Other  Satellite  Programs,  GAO–06–993  (Washington,  D.C.:  Sept.  6,  2006).  This  re-
port (1) determines the status of and plans for the GOES–R series procurement, and
(2)  identifies  and  evaluates  the  actions  that  the  program  management  team  is  tak-
ing  to  ensure  that  past  problems  experienced  in  procuring  other  satellite  programs
are not repeated.
What GAO Recommends

In  our  report,  we  make  recommendations  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to  im-
prove  NOAA’s  ability  to  effectively  manage  the  GOES–R  procurement.  In  written
comments,  the  Department  of  Commerce  agreed  with  the  recommendations  and
identified plans for implementing them.
What GAO Found

At  the  time  of  our  review,  NOAA  was  nearing  the  end  of  the  preliminary  design
phase  of  its  GOES–R  system—which  was  estimated  to  cost  $6.2  billion  and  sched-
uled to have the first satellite ready for launch in 2012. It expected to award a con-
tract in August 2007 to develop this system. However, recent analyses of the GOES–
R program cost—which in May 2006 the program office estimated could reach $11.4
billion—have  led  the  agency  to  consider  reducing  the  scope  of  requirements  for  the
satellite series. Since our report was issued, NOAA officials told GAO that the agen-
cy  has  made  a  decision  to  reduce  the  scope  of  the  program  to  a  minimum  of  two
satellites  and  to  reduce  the  complexity  of  the  program  by  canceling  a  technically
complex instrument.

NOAA has taken steps to implement lessons learned from past satellite programs,
but more remains to be done. Prior satellite programs—including a prior GOES se-
ries,  a  polar-orbiting  environmental  satellite  series,  and  various  military  satellite
programs—often  experienced  technical  challenges,  cost  overruns,  and  schedule
delays.  Key  lessons  from  these  programs  include  the  need  to  (1)  establish  realistic
cost and schedule estimates, (2) ensure sufficient technical readiness of the system’s

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

components prior to key decisions, (3) provide sufficient management at government
and contractor levels, and (4) perform adequate senior executive oversight to ensure
mission success. NOAA has established plans to address these lessons by conducting
independent  cost  estimates,  performing  preliminary  studies  of  key  technologies,
placing  resident  government  offices  at  key  contractor  locations,  and  establishing  a
senior executive oversight committee. However, many steps remain to fully address
these  lessons  (see  table).  Until  it  completes  these  activities,  NOAA  faces  an  in-
creased  risk  that  the  GOES–R  program  will  repeat  the  increased  cost,  schedule
delays, and performance shortfalls that have plagued past procurements.

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee:

We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  on  the  planned
Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites-R  (GOES–R)  program.  The
GOES–R  series  is  to  replace  the  current  series  of  satellites  which  will  likely  begin
to  reach  the  end  of  their  useful  lives  in  approximately  2012.  This  new  series  is  ex-
pected to mark the first major technological advance in GOES instrumentation since
1994. It is also considered critical to the United States’ ability to maintain the con-
tinuity of data required for weather forecasting through the year 2028.

As  requested,  our  testimony  summarizes  and  updates  a  report  we  previously
issued  to  your  subcommittee  that  (1)  determines  the  status  of  and  plans  for  the
GOES–R  series  procurement,  and  (2)  identifies  and  evaluates  the  actions  that  the
program  management  team  is  taking  to  ensure  that  past  problems  experienced  in
procuring  other  satellite  programs  are  not  repeated.1 In  preparing  for  this  testi-
mony,  we  relied  on  our  work  supporting  the  accompanying  report.  That  report  con-
tains a detailed overview of our scope and methodology. All the work on which this
testimony  is  based  was  performed  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted  govern-
ment auditing standards.
Results in Brief

The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) is nearing the end
of  the  preliminary  design  phase  of  its  GOES–R  system,  which  was  initially  esti-
mated  to  cost  $6.2  billion  and  scheduled  to  have  the  first  satellite  ready  for  launch
in  2012.  At  the  time  of  our  review,  NOAA  had  issued  contracts  for  the  preliminary
design of the overall GOES–R system to three vendors and expected to award a con-
tract  to  one  of  these  vendors  in  August  2007  to  develop  the  satellites.  In  addition,
to  reduce  the  risks  associated  with  developing  new  instruments,  NOAA  issued  con-
tracts for the early development of two instruments and for the preliminary designs
of  three  other  instruments.  The  agency  plans  to  turn  these  instrument  contracts
over  to  the  vendor  that  is  awarded  the  contract  for  the  overall  GOES–R  program.
However,  recent  analyses  of  the  GOES–R  program  cost—which  in  May  2006  the
program office estimated could reach $11.4 billion—have led the agency to consider

1 GAO,  Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incorporating
Lessons Learned from Other Satellite Programs, GAO–06–993 (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 6, 2006).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

reducing the scope of requirements for the satellite series. At the time of our review,
NOAA  officials  estimated  that  a  decision  on  the  future  scope  and  direction  of  the
program  could  be  made  by  the  end  of  September  2006.  Since  then,  NOAA  officials
told  us  that  the  agency  has  made  a  decision  to  reduce  the  scope  and  complexity  of
the  GOES–R  program  by  reducing  the  number  of  satellites  and  canceling  a  tech-
nically complex instrument.

NOAA has taken steps to implement lessons learned from past satellite programs,
but more remains to be done. Prior satellite programs—including a prior GOES se-
ries,  a  polar-orbiting  environmental  satellite  series,  and  various  military  satellite
programs—often  experience  technical  challenges,  cost  overruns,  and  schedule
delays.  Key  lessons  from  these  programs  include  the  need  to  (1)  establish  realistic
cost and schedule estimates, (2) ensure sufficient technical readiness of the system’s
components prior to key decisions, (3) provide sufficient management at government
and contractor levels, and (4) perform adequate senior executive oversight to ensure
mission success. NOAA has established plans to address these lessons by conducting
independent  cost  estimates,  performing  preliminary  studies  of  key  technologies,
placing  resident  government  offices  at  key  contractor  locations,  and  establishing  a
senior executive oversight committee. However, many steps remain to fully address
these  lessons.  Specifically,  NOAA  has  not  yet  developed  a  process  to  evaluate  and
reconcile  the  independent  and  government  cost  estimates.  In  addition,  NOAA  has
not  yet  determined  how  it  will  ensure  that  a  sufficient  level  of  technical  maturity
will  be  achieved  in  time  for  an  upcoming  decision  milestone,  nor  has  it  determined
the appropriate level of resources it needs to adequately track and oversee the pro-
gram  using  earned  value  management.2 Until  it  completes  these  activities,  NOAA
faces  an  increased  risk  that  the  GOES–R  program  will  repeat  the  increased  cost,
schedule  delays,  and  performance  shortfalls  that  have  plagued  past  procurements.
To  improve  NOAA’s  ability  to  effectively  manage  the  GOES–R  procurement,  in
our accompanying report,3 we made recommendations to the Secretary of Commerce
to  direct  its  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  to  establish  a  process  for  objec-
tively evaluating and reconciling the government and independent life cycle cost es-
timates once the program requirements are finalized; to establish a team of system
engineering  experts  to  perform  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  Advanced  Baseline
Imager  instrument  to  determine  the  level  of  technical  maturity  achieved  on  the  in-
strument  before  moving  the  instrument  into  production;  and  to  seek  assistance  in
determining the appropriate levels of resources needed at the program office to ade-
quately  track  and  oversee  the  contractor’s  earned  value  management  data.  In  writ-
ten comments, the Department of Commerce agreed with our recommendations and
provided information on its plans to implement our recommendations.
Background

Since  the  1960s,  geostationary  and  polar-orbiting  environmental  satellites  have
been used by the United States to provide meteorological data for weather observa-
tion,  research,  and  forecasting.  NOAA’s  National  Environmental  Satellite  Data  and
Information Service (NESDIS) is responsible for managing the civilian geostationary
and polar-orbiting satellite systems as two separate programs, called GOES and the
Polar Operational Environmental Satellites, respectively.

Unlike  polar-orbiting  satellites,  which  constantly  circle  the  earth  in  a  relatively
low  polar  orbit,  geostationary  satellites  can  maintain  a  constant  view  of  the  earth
from  a  high  orbit  of  about  22,300  miles  in  space.  NOAA  operates  GOES  as  a  two-
satellite  system  that  is  primarily  focused  on  the  United  States  (see  Fig.  1).  These
satellites are uniquely positioned to provide timely environmental data to meteorolo-
gists  and  their  audiences  on  the  earth’s  atmosphere,  its  surface,  cloud  cover,  and
the  space  environment.  They  also  observe  the  development  of  hazardous  weather,
such as hurricanes and severe thunderstorms, and track their movement and inten-
sity to reduce or avoid major losses of property and life. Furthermore, the satellites’
ability  to  provide  broad,  continuously  updated  coverage  of  atmospheric  conditions
over land and oceans is important to NOAA’s weather forecasting operations.

2 Earned value management is a method that compares the value of work accomplished during

a given period with that of the work expected in that period.

3 GAO–06–993.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

To  provide  continuous  satellite  coverage,  NOAA  acquires  several  satellites  at  a
time  as  part  of  a  series  and  launches  new  satellites  every  few  years  (see  Table  1).

Three  satellites—GOES–11,  GOES–12,  and  GOES–13—are  currently  in  orbit.
Both  GOES–11  and  GOES–12  are  operational  satellites,  while  GOES–13  is  in  an
on-orbit storage mode. It is a backup for the other two satellites should they experi-
ence  any  degradation  in  service.  The  others  in  the  series,  GOES–O  and  GOES–P,
are  planned  for  launch  over  the  next  few  years.4 NOAA  is  also  planning  a  future
generation of satellites, known as the GOES–R series, which are planned for launch
beginning in 2012.

Each  of  the  operational  geostationary  satellites  continuously  transmits  raw  envi-
ronmental  data  to  NOAA  ground  stations.  The  data  are  processed  at  these  ground
stations and transmitted back to the satellite for broadcast to primary weather serv-
ices  both  in  the  United  States  and  around  the  world,  including  the  global  research

4 Satellites  in  a  series  are  identified  by  letters  of  the  alphabet  when  they  are  on  the  ground

and by numbers once they are in orbit.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

community.  Raw  and  processed  data  are  also  distributed  to  users  via  ground  sta-
tions through other communication channels, such as dedicated private communica-
tion  lines  and  the  Internet.  Figure  2  depicts  a  generic  data  relay  pattern  from  the
geostationary satellites to the ground stations and commercial terminals.

GOES–R Program—An Overview

NOAA is planning for the GOES–R program to improve on the technology of prior
GOES  series,  in  terms  of  both  system  and  instrument  improvements.  The  system
improvements are expected to fulfill more demanding user requirements and to pro-
vide  more  rapid  information  updates.  Table  2  highlights  key  system-related  im-
provements GOES–R is expected to make to the geostationary satellite program.

The  instruments  on  the  GOES–R  series  are  expected  to  increase  the  clarity  and
precision  of  the  observed  environmental  data.  NOAA  plans  to  acquire  five  different
types  of  instruments.  The  program  office  considered  two  of  the  instruments—the
Advanced Baseline Imager and the Hyperspectral Environmental Suite—to be most

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

critical because they would provide data for key weather products.5 Table 3 summa-
rizes the originally planned instruments and their expected capabilities.

29

GOES–R Program Office Structure

The  program  management  structure  for  the  GOES–R  program  differs  from  past
GOES  programs.  Prior  to  the  GOES–R  series,  NOAA  was  responsible  for  program
funding,  procurement  of  the  ground  elements,  and  on-orbit  operation  of  the  sat-
ellites,  while  NASA  was  responsible  for  the  procurement  of  the  spacecraft,  instru-
ments,  and  launch  services.  NOAA  officials  stated  that  this  approach  limited  the
agency’s  insight  and  management  involvement  in  the  procurement  of  major  ele-
ments of the system.

Alternatively,  under  the  GOES–R  management  structure,  NOAA  has  responsi-
bility for the procurement and operation of the overall system—including spacecraft,
instruments,  and  launch  services.  NASA  is  responsible  for  the  procurement  of  the
individual  instruments  until  they  are  transferred  to  the  overall  GOES–R  system
contractor  for  completion  and  integration  onto  the  spacecraft.  Additionally,  to  take
advantage  of  NASA’s  acquisition  experience  and  technical  expertise,  NOAA  located
the  GOES–R  program  office  at  NASA’s  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center.  It  also  des-
ignated key program management positions to be filled with NASA personnel. These
positions  include  the  deputy  system  program  director  role  for  advanced  instrument
and  technology  infusion,  the  project  manager  for  the  flight  portion  of  the  system,
and  the  deputy  project  manager  for  the  ground  and  operations  portion  of  the  sys-
tem. NOAA officials explained that they changed the management structure for the
GOES–R program in order to streamline oversight and fiduciary responsibilities, but
that they still plan to rely on NASA’s expertise in space system acquisitions.
Satellite  Programs  Often  Experience  Technical  Problems,  Cost  Overruns,

and Schedule Delays

Satellite  programs  are  often  technically  complex  and  risky  undertakings,  and  as
a  result,  they  often  experience  technical  problems,  cost  overruns,  and  schedule
delays.  We  and  others  have  reported  on  a  historical  pattern  of  repeated  missteps
in the procurement of major satellite systems, including the National Polar-orbiting
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS),  the  GOES  I–M  series,  the

5 After  our  report  was  issued  on  September  6,  2006,  NOAA  officials  told  us  that  the  agency
has  decided  to  cancel  its  plans  for  the  development  of  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite
but expects to explore options that will ensure continuity of data provided by the current GOES
series.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

Space  Based  Infrared  System  High  Program  (SBIRS–High),  and  the  Advanced  Ex-
tremely High Frequency Satellite System (AEHF).6 Table 4 lists key problems expe-
rienced with these programs.

GOES–R Procurement Activities Are Under Way, but System Requirements

and Cost Estimates Are Changing

At  the  time  of  our  review,  NOAA  was  nearing  the  end  of  the  preliminary  design
phase  on  its  GOES–R  program  and  planned  to  award  a  contract  for  the  system’s
development  in  August  2007.  However,  because  of  concerns  with  potential  cost
growth,  NOAA’s  plans  for  the  GOES–R  procurement  are  changing.  To  date,  NOAA
has  issued  contracts  for  the  preliminary  design  of  the  overall  GOES–R  system  to
three  vendors  and  expects  to  award  a  contract  to  one  of  these  vendors  to  develop
the  system.  In  addition,  to  reduce  the  risks  associated  with  developing  new  instru-
ments, NASA has issued contracts for the early development of two instruments and
for the preliminary designs of three other instruments.7 The agency plans to award
these contracts and then turn them over to the contractor responsible for the overall
GOES–R  program.  However,  this  approach  is  under  review  and  NOAA  may  wait
until  the  instruments  are  fully  developed  before  turning  them  over  to  the  system
contractor.  Table  5  provides  a  summary  of  the  status  of  contracts  for  the  GOES–
R program.

6 GAO,  Defense  Acquisitions:  Space  System  Acquisition  Risks  and  Keys  to  Addressing  Them,
GAO–06–776R (Washington, D.C.: June 1, 2006); Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Sat-
ellites:  Cost  Increases  Trigger  Review  and  Place  Program’s  Direction  on  Hold,  GAO–06–573T
(Washington,  D.C.:  Mar.  30,  2006);  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Tech-
nical  Problems,  Cost  Increases,  and  Schedule  Delays  Trigger  Need  for  Difficult  Trade-off  Deci-
sions, GAO–06–249T (Washington, D.C.: Nov. 16, 2005); Polar-orbiting Environmental Satellites:
Information  on  Program  Cost  and  Schedule  Changes,  GAO–04–1054  (Washington,  D.C.:  Sept.
30,  2004);  Defense  Acquisitions:  Despite  Restructuring,  SBIRS  High  Program  Remains  at  Risk
of  Cost  and  Schedule  Overruns,  GAO–04–48  (Washington,  D.C.:  Oct.  31,  2003);  Military  Space
Operations:  Common  Problems  and  Their  Effects  on  Satellite  and  Related  Acquisitions,  GAO–
03–825R  (Washington,  D.C.:  June  2,  2003);  Defense  Acquisitions:  Assessments  of  Major  Weapon
Programs, GAO–03–476 (Washington, D.C.: May 15, 2003); Weather Satellites: Action Needed to
Resolve  Status  of  the  U.S.  Geostationary  Satellite  Program,  GAO/NSIAD–91–252  (Washington,
D.C.:  July  24,  1991).  Defense  Science  Board/Air  Force  Scientific  Advisory  Board  Joint  Task
Force, Report on the Acquisition of National Security Space Programs (May 2003).

7 The development contract for the Space Environmental In-Situ Suite instrument was issued

after we completed our review.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

According  to  program  documentation  provided  to  the  Office  of  Management  and
Budget  in  2005,  the  official  life  cycle  cost  estimate  for  GOES–R  was  approximately
$6.2 billion (see Table 6). However, program officials reported that this estimate was
over two years old and under review.

At the time of our review, NOAA was planning to launch the first GOES–R series
satellite in September 2012.8 The development of the schedule for launching the sat-
ellites  was  driven  by  a  requirement  that  the  satellites  be  available  to  back  up  the
last  remaining  GOES  satellites  (GOES–O  and  GOES–P)  should  anything  go  wrong
during  the  planned  launches  of  these  satellites.  Table  7  provides  a  summary  of  the
planned launch schedule for the originally planned GOES–R series.

8 After  our  report  was  issued  on  September  6,  2006,  NOAA  officials  told  us  that  the  planned
launch  schedule  was  being  delayed.  The  expected  launch  of  the  first  GOES–R  series  satellite
is now planned for December 2014.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

However,  NOAA’s  plans  for  the  GOES–R  procurement  are  changing  because  of
concerns  with  potential  cost  growth.  Given  its  experiences  with  cost  growth  on  the
NPOESS  acquisition,  NOAA  asked  program  officials  to  recalculate  the  total  cost  of
the  estimated  $6.2  billion  GOES–R  program.  In  May  2006,  program  officials  esti-
mated  that  the  life  cycle  cost  could  reach  $11.4  billion.  The  agency  then  requested
that the program identify options for reducing the scope of requirements for the sat-
ellite series. Program officials reported that there were over 10 viable options under
consideration,  including  options  for  removing  one  or  more  of  the  planned  instru-
ments.  The  program  office  also  reevaluated  its  planned  acquisition  schedule  based
on  the  potential  program  options.  Specifically,  program  officials  stated  that  if  there
was  a  decision  to  make  a  major  change  in  system  requirements,  they  would  likely
extend the preliminary design phase, delay the decision to proceed into the develop-
ment  and  production  phase,  and  delay  the  contract  award  date.  At  the  time  of  our
review,  NOAA  officials  estimated  that  a  decision  on  the  future  scope  and  direction
of the program could be made by the end of September 2006.
Recent NOAA Decision on the Direction and Scope of the GOES–R Program
In  mid-September  2006,  NOAA  officials  reported  that  a  decision  on  the  future
scope  and  direction  of  GOES–R  had  been  made—and  involved  a  reduction  in  the
number  of  satellites  and  in  planned  program  capabilities,  a  revised  life  cycle  cost
estimate,  and  the  delay  of  key  programmatic  milestones.  Specifically,  NOAA  re-
duced  the  minimum  number  of  satellites  to  two.  In  addition,  plans  for  developing
the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite—which  was  once  considered  a  critical  in-
strument by the agency—were canceled. Instead, the program office is exploring op-
tions that will ensure continuity of sounding data currently provided by the current
GOES  series.9 NOAA  officials  reported  that  the  cost  of  the  restructured  program  is
not  known,  but  some  anticipate  it  will  be  close  to  the  original  program  estimate  of
$6.2  billion.  The  contract  award  for  the  GOES–R  system  has  been  pushed  out  to
May 2008. Finally, the planned launch date of the first satellite in the GOES–R se-
ries has been delayed until December 2014.
The  GOES–R  Program  Office  Has  Taken  Steps  to  Address  Past  Lessons

Learned, But Significant Actions Remain

NOAA  has  taken  steps  to  apply  lessons  learned  from  problems  encountered  on
other satellite programs to the GOES–R procurement. Key lessons include (1) estab-
lishing  realistic  cost  and  schedule  estimates,  (2)  ensuring  sufficient  technical  readi-
ness of the system’s components prior to key decisions, (3) providing sufficient man-
agement  at  government  and  contractor  levels,  and  (4)  performing  adequate  senior
executive oversight to ensure mission success. NOAA has established plans designed
to mitigate the problems faced in past acquisitions; however, many activities remain

9 The Hyperspectral Environmental Suite was intended to be the successor to the sounder in-
strument on-board the current GOES series. The sounder measures radiated energy at different
depths  (altitudes)  and  also  records  surface  and  cloud-top  temperatures  and  ozone  distribution.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

to fully address these lessons. Until it completes these activities, NOAA faces an in-
creased  risk  that  the  GOES–R  program  will  repeat  the  increased  cost,  schedule
delays, and performance shortfalls that have plagued past procurements.
Efforts  to  Improve  Reliability  of  Cost  and  Schedule  Estimates  are  Under

Way, But Key Steps Remain in Reconciling Cost Estimates

We  and  others  have  reported  that  space  system  acquisitions  are  strongly  biased
to  produce  unrealistically  low  cost  and  schedule  estimates  in  the  acquisition  proc-
ess.10 Our  past  work  on  military  space  acquisitions  has  indicated  that  during  pro-
gram  formulation,  the  competition  to  win  funding  is  intense  and  has  led  program
sponsors to minimize their program cost estimates. NOAA programs face similar un-
realistic estimates. For example, the total development cost of the GOES I–M acqui-
sition  was  over  three  times  greater  than  planned,  escalating  from  $640  million  to
$2  billion.  Additionally,  the  delivery  of  the  first  satellite  was  delayed  by  five  years.
NOAA  has  several  efforts  under  way  to  improve  the  reliability  of  its  cost  and
schedule  estimates  for  the  GOES–R  program.  NOAA’s  Chief  Financial  Officer  has
contracted  with  a  cost-estimating  firm  to  complete  an  independent  cost  estimate,
while  the  GOES–R  program  office  has  hired  a  support  contractor  to  assist  with  its
internal  program  cost  estimating.  The  program  office  is  re-assessing  its  estimates
based on preliminary information from the three vendors contracted to develop pre-
liminary designs for the overall GOES–R system. Once the program office and inde-
pendent cost estimates are completed, program officials intend to compare them and
to develop a revised programmatic cost estimate that will be used in its decision on
whether to proceed into system development and production. In addition, NOAA has
planned  for  an  independent  review  team—consisting  of  former  senior  industry  and
government space acquisition experts—to provide an assessment of the program of-
fice  and  independent  cost  estimates  for  this  decision  milestone.  To  improve  its
schedule reliability, the program office is currently conducting a schedule risk anal-
ysis in order to estimate the amount of adequate reserve funds and schedule margin
needed to deal with unexpected problems and setbacks. Finally, the NOAA Observ-
ing  System  Council11 submitted  a  prioritized  list  of  GOES–R  system  requirements
to  the  Commerce  Under  Secretary  for  approval.  This  list  is  expected  to  allow  the
program  office  to  act  quickly  in  deleting  lower  priority  requirements  in  the  event
of severe technical challenges or shifting funding streams.

While  NOAA  acknowledges  the  need  to  establish  realistic  cost  and  schedule  esti-
mates,  several  hurdles  remain.  As  discussed  earlier,  the  agency  was  considering—
during the time of our review—reducing the requirements for the GOES–R program
to  mitigate  the  increased  cost  estimates  for  the  program.  Prior  to  this  decision,  the
agency’s efforts to establish realistic cost estimates could not be fully effective in ad-
dressing this lesson. In addition, NOAA suspended the work being performed by its
independent cost estimator. Now that the program scope and direction is being fur-
ther  defined,  it  will  be  important  for  the  agency  to  restart  this  work.  Further,  the
agency  has  not  yet  developed  a  process  to  evaluate  and  reconcile  the  independent
and  program  office  cost  estimates  once  final  program  decisions  are  made.  Without
this process, the agency may lack the objectivity necessary to counter the optimism
of program sponsors and is more likely to move forward with an unreliable estimate.
Until it completes this activity, NOAA faces an increased risk that the GOES–R pro-
gram will repeat the cost increases and schedule delays that have plagued past pro-
curements.
Preliminary  Studies  Are  Under  Way,  But  Steps  Remain  in  Determining

Components’ Technical Maturity

Space  programs  often  experience  unforeseen  technical  problems  in  the  develop-
ment of critical components as a result of having insufficient knowledge of the com-
ponents and their supporting technologies prior to key decision points. One key deci-
sion point is when an agency decides on whether the component is sufficiently ready
to  proceed  from  a  preliminary  study  phase  into  a  development  phase;  this  decision
point  results  in  the  award  of  the  development  contract.  Another  key  decision  point
occurs  during  the  development  phase  when  an  agency  decides  whether  the  compo-

10 GAO,  Space  Acquisitions:  Stronger  Development  Practices  and  Investment  Planning  Needed
to  Address  Continuing  Problems,  GAO–05–891T  (Washington,  D.C.:  July  12,  2005).  Defense
Science  Board/Air  Force  Scientific  Advisory  Board  Joint  Task  Force,  Report  on  the  Acquisition
of National Security Space Programs (May 2003).

11 NOAA’s Observing System Council is the principal advisory council for NOAA’s Earth obser-
vation and data management activities. It includes members from each NOAA line office, other
relevant  councils,  and  program  offices.  The  Assistant  Administrator  for  Satellite  and  Informa-
tion Services and the Assistant Administrator for Weather Services serve as the co-chairs of the
council.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

nent  is  ready  to  proceed  from  design  into  production  (also  called  the  critical  design
review).  Without  sufficient  technical  readiness  at  these  milestones,  agencies  could
proceed into development contracts on components that are not well understood and
enter  into  the  production  phase  of  development  with  technologies  that  are  not  yet
mature.

In  1997,  NOAA  began  preliminary  studies  on  technologies  that  could  be  used  on
the  GOES–R  instruments.  These  studies  target  existing  technologies  and  assessed
how they could be expanded for GOES–R. The program office is also conducting de-
tailed trade-off studies on the integrated system to improve its ability to make deci-
sions  that  balance  performance,  affordability,  risk,  and  schedule.  For  instance,  the
program office is analyzing the potential architectures for the GOES–R constellation
of  satellites—the  quantity  and  configuration  of  satellites,  including  how  the  instru-
ments  will  be  distributed  over  these  satellites.  These  studies  are  expected  to  allow
for a more mature definition of the system specifications.

NOAA  has  also  developed  plans  to  have  an  independent  review  team  assess
project status on an annual basis once the overall system contract has been award-
ed.  In  particular,  this  team  will  review  technical,  programmatic,  and  management
areas; identify any outstanding risks; and recommend corrective actions. This meas-
ure is designed to ensure that sufficient technical readiness has been reached prior
to  the  critical  design  review  milestone.  The  program  office’s  ongoing  studies  and
plans are expected to provide greater insight into the technical requirements for key
system components and to mitigate the risk of unforeseen problems in later acquisi-
tion phases.

However, the progress currently being made on a key instrument currently under
development—the  Advanced  Baseline  Imager—has  experienced  technical  problems
and could be an indication of more problems to come in the future. These problems
relate  to,  among  other  things,  the  design  complexity  of  the  instrument’s  detectors
and electronics. As a result, the contractor is experiencing negative cost and sched-
ule performance trends. As of May 2006, the contractor incurred a total cost overrun
of  almost  $6  million  with  the  instrument’s  development  only  28  percent  complete.
In  addition,  from  June  2005  to  May  2006,  it  was  unable  to  complete  approximately
$3.3 million worth of work. Unless risk mitigation actions are aggressively pursued
to  reverse  these  trends,  we  project  the  cost  overrun  at  completion  to  be  about  $23
million.

While NOAA expects to make a decision on whether to move the instrument into
production  (a  milestone  called  the  critical  design  review)  in  January  2007,  the  con-
tractor’s current performance raises questions as to whether the instrument designs
will be sufficiently mature by that time. Further, the agency does not have a process
to  validate  the  level  of  technical  maturity  achieved  on  this  instrument  or  to  deter-
mine whether the contractor has implemented sound management and process engi-
neering  to  ensure  that  the  appropriate  level  of  technical  readiness  can  be  achieved
prior to the decision milestone. Until it does so, NOAA risks making a poor decision
based  on  inaccurate  or  insufficient  information—which  could  lead  to  unforeseen
technical problems in the development of this instrument.
Efforts to Strengthen Government and Contractor Management Are Under

Way, But Significant Work on Program Controls Remain

In the past, we have reported on poor performance in the management of satellite
acquisitions.12 The  key  drivers  of  poor  management  included  inadequate  systems
engineering  and  earned  value  management13 capabilities,  unsuitable  allocation  of
contract  award  fees,  inadequate  levels  of  management  reserve,  and  inefficient  deci-
sion-making and reporting structure within the program office.

NOAA has taken numerous steps to restructure its management approach on the
GOES–R  procurement  in  an  effort  to  improve  performance  and  to  avoid  past  mis-
takes. These steps include:

to be located on-site at prime contractor and key subcontractor locations.

• The program office revised its staffing profile to provide for government staff
• The  program  office  plans  to  increase  the  number  of  resident  systems  engi-
neers from 31 to 54 to provide adequate government oversight of the contrac-

12 GAO–06–573T,  GAO–06–249T,  GAO/NSIAD–91–252,  Defense  Acquisitions:  DOD  Has  Paid
Billions  in  Award  and  Incentive  Fees  Regardless  of  Acquisition  Outcomes,  GAO–06–66  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: Dec. 19, 2005), and Weather Satellites: Cost Growth and Development Delays Jeop-
ardize U.S. Forecasting Ability, GAO/NSIAD–89–169 (Washington, D.C.: June 30, 1989).

13 Earned  value  management  is  a  method,  used  by  DOD  for  several  decades,  to  track  a  con-
tractor’s  progress  in  meeting  project  deliverables.  It  compares  the  value  of  work  accomplished
during  a  given  period  with  that  of  the  work  expected  in  that  period.  Differences  from  expecta-
tions are measured in both cost and schedule variances.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

value management to monitor contractor cost and schedule performance.

tor’s  system  engineering,  including  verification  and  validation  of  engineering
designs  at  key  decision  points  (such  as  the  critical  design  review  milestone).
• The program office has better defined the role and responsibilities of the pro-
gram  scientist,  the  individual  who  is  expected  to  maintain  an  independent
voice  with  regard  to  scientific  matters  and  advise  the  program  manager  on
related technical issues and risks.
• The  program  office  also  intends  to  add  three  resident  specialists  in  earned
• NOAA has work under way to develop the GOES–R contract award fee struc-
ture  and  the  award  fee  review  board  that  is  consistent  with  our  recent  find-
ings,  the  Commerce  Inspector  General’s  findings,  and  other  best  practices,
such  as  designating  a  non-program  executive  as  the  fee-determining  official
to ensure objectivity in the allocation of award fees.
• NOAA  and  NASA  have  implemented  a  more  integrated  management  ap-
proach  that  is  designed  to  draw  on  NASA’s  expertise  in  satellite  acquisitions
and increase NOAA’s involvement on all major components of the acquisition.
• The  program  office  reported  that  it  intended  to  establish  a  management  re-
serve  of  25  percent  consistent  with  the  recommendations  of  the  Defense
Science  Board  Report  on  Acquisition  of  National  Security  Space  Programs.14
While  these  steps  should  provide  more  robust  government  oversight  and  inde-
pendent  analysis  capabilities,  more  work  remains  to  be  done  to  fully  address  this
lesson.  Specifically,  the  program  office  has  not  determined  the  appropriate  level  of
resources it needs to adequately track and oversee the program and the planned ad-
dition of three earned value management specialists may not be enough as acquisi-
tion activities increase. By contrast, after its recent problems and in response to the
independent  review  team  findings,  NPOESS  program  officials  plan  to  add  10  pro-
gram  staff  dedicated  to  earned  value,  cost,  and  schedule  analysis.  An  insufficient
level  of  established  capabilities  in  earned  value  management  places  the  GOES–R
program office at risk of making poor decisions based on inaccurate and potentially
misleading information. Finally, while NOAA officials believe that assuming sole re-
sponsibility for the acquisition of GOES–R will improve their ability to manage the
program effectively, this change also elevates NOAA’s risk for mission success. Spe-
cifically, NOAA is taking on its first major system acquisition and an increased risk
due  to  its  lack  of  experience.  Until  it  fully  addresses  the  lesson  of  ensuring  an  ap-
propriate  level  of  resources  to  oversee  its  contractor,  NOAA  faces  an  increased  risk
that the GOES–R program will repeat the management and contractor performance
shortfalls that have plagued past procurements.
NOAA Has Established a Senior Executive Committee to Perform Oversight

Role

We and others have reported on NOAA’s significant deficiencies in its senior exec-
utive oversight of NPOESS.15 The lack of timely decisions and regular involvement
of senior executive management was a critical factor in the program’s rapid cost and
schedule growth.

NOAA  formed  its  program  management  council  in  response  to  the  lack  of  ade-
quate senior executive oversight on NPOESS. In particular, this council is expected
to  provide  regular  reviews  and  assessments  of  selected  NOAA  programs  and
projects—the  first  of  which  is  the  GOES–R  program.  The  council  is  headed  by  the
NOAA  Deputy  Undersecretary  and  includes  senior  officials  from  Commerce  and
NASA. The council is expected to hold meetings to discuss GOES–R program status
on  a  monthly  basis  and  to  approve  the  program’s  entry  into  subsequent  acquisition
phases  at  key  decision  milestones—including  contract  award  and  critical  design  re-
views,  among  others.  Since  its  establishment  in  January  2006,  the  council  has  met
regularly and has established a mechanism for tracking action items to closure.

The establishment of the NOAA Program Management Council is a positive action
that  should  support  the  agency’s  senior-level  governance  of  the  GOES–R  program.
In  moving  forward,  it  is  important  that  this  council  continue  to  meet  on  a  regular
basis and exercise diligence in questioning the data presented to it and making dif-
ficult  decisions.  In  particular,  it  will  be  essential  that  the  results  of  all  preliminary
studies  and  independent  assessments  on  technical  maturity  of  the  system  and  its

14 Defense  Science  Board/Air  Force  Scientific  Advisory  Board  Joint  Task  Force,  Report  on  the

Acquisition of National Security Space Programs (May 2003).

15 GAO–06–573T;  Department  of  Commerce  Office  of  Inspector  General,  Poor  Management
Oversight  and  Ineffective  Incentives  Leave  NPOESS  Program  Well  Over  Budget  and  Behind
Schedule, OIG–17794–6–0001 (May 8, 2006).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

components  be  reviewed  by  this  council  so  that  an  informed  decision  can  be  made
about  the  level  of  technical  complexity  it  is  taking  on  when  proceeding  past  these
key decision milestones. In light of the recent uncertainty regarding the future scope
and cost of the GOES–R program, the council’s governance will be critical in making
those difficult decisions in a timely manner.
Implementation of GAO Recommendations Should Improve NOAA’s Efforts

to Implement Lessons Learned

To  improve  NOAA’s  ability  to  effectively  manage  the  GOES–R  procurement,  in
our  accompanying  report,16 we  recommended  that  the  Secretary  direct  its  NOAA
Program Management Council to take the following three actions:

• Once  the  scope  of  the  program  has  been  finalized,  establish  a  process  for  ob-
jectively evaluating and reconciling the government and independent life cycle
cost estimates.
• Perform a comprehensive review of the Advanced Baseline Imager, using sys-
tem engineering experts, to determine the level of technical maturity achieved
on  the  instrument,  to  assess  whether  the  contractor  has  implemented  sound
management  and  process  engineering,  and  to  assert  that  the  technology  is
sufficiently mature before moving the instrument into production.
• Seek  assistance  from  an  independent  review  team  to  determine  the  appro-
priate level of resources needed at the program office to adequately track and
oversee  the  contractor’s  earned  value  management.  Among  other  things,  the
program office should be able to perform a comprehensive integrated baseline
review after system development contract award, provide surveillance of con-
tractor  earned  value  management  systems,  and  perform  project  scheduling
analyses and cost estimates.

In  written  comments,  Commerce  agreed  with  our  recommendations  and  provided
information  on  its  plans  to  implement  our  recommendations.  In  particular,  Com-
merce  intends  to  establish  a  process  for  evaluating  and  reconciling  the  various  cost
estimates  and  to  analyze  this  process  and  the  results  with  an  independent  review
team  comprised  of  recognized  satellite  acquisition  experts.  The  agency  is  also  plan-
ning  to  have  this  independent  review  team  provide  assessments  of  the  Advanced
Baseline  Imager’s  technical  maturity  and  the  adequacy  of  the  program  manage-
ment’s staffing plans.

In  summary,  the  procurement  of  the  next  series  of  geostationary  environmental
satellites—called  the  GOES–R  series—is  at  a  critical  juncture.  Recent  concerns
about the potential for cost growth on the GOES–R procurement have led the agen-
cy  to  reduce  the  scope  of  requirements  for  the  satellite  series.  According  to  NOAA
officials,  the  current  plans  call  for  acquiring  two  satellites  and  moving  away  from
a technically complex new instrument in favor of existing technologies. While reduc-
ing  the  technical  complexity  of  the  system  prior  to  contract  award  and  defining  an
affordable  program  are  sound  business  practices,  it  will  be  important  for  NOAA  to
balance these actions with the agencies’ long-term need for improving geostationary
satellites over time.

While  NOAA  is  positioning  itself  to  improve  the  acquisition  of  this  system  by  in-
corporating the lessons learned from other satellite procurements including the need
to  establish  realistic  cost  estimates,  ensure  sufficient  government  and  contractor
management, and obtain effective executive oversight, further steps remain to fully
address  selected  lessons  and  thereby  mitigate  program  risks.  Specifically,  NOAA
has not yet developed a process to evaluate and reconcile the independent and gov-
ernment  cost  estimates.  In  addition,  NOAA  has  not  yet  determined  how  it  will  en-
sure that a sufficient level of technical maturity will be achieved in time for an up-
coming decision milestone or determined the appropriate level of resources it needs
to  adequately  track  and  oversee  the  program  using  earned  value  management.
Moreover,  problems  that  are  frequently  experienced  on  major  satellite  acquisitions,
including  insufficient  technical  maturity,  overly  aggressive  schedules,  inadequate
systems  engineering  capabilities,  and  insufficient  management  reserve  will  need  to
be closely monitored throughout this critical acquisition’s life cycle. To NOAA’s cred-
it,  it  has  begun  to  develop  plans  for  implementing  our  recommendations.  These
plans  include,  among  other  things,  establishing  a  process  to  evaluate  and  reconcile
the  various  cost  estimates  and  obtaining  assessments  from  an  independent  review
team  on  the  technical  maturity  of  a  key  instrument  in  development  and  the  ade-
quacy  of  the  program  management’s  staffing  plans.  However,  until  it  addresses
these lessons, NOAA faces an increased risk that the GOES–R program will repeat

16 GAO–06–993.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

the  increased  cost,  schedule  delays,  and  performance  shortfalls  that  have  plagued
past procurements.

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any

questions that you or Members of the Committee may have at this time.

DISCUSSION

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you. And as evidence of the high de-
gree of professionalism we have come to expect from GAO, you fin-
ished exactly on the five-minute mark. And so I want to thank you
for  your  testimony,  and  I  want  to  thank  you  and  your  colleagues
at the GAO for the outstanding work you do. Now we are going to
recess. We have for the benefit of my colleagues three minutes and
fifteen  seconds  to  get  over  to  the  floor.  We  will  get  back  as  soon
as we can. Thank you very much.

[Recess.]

ESTIMATED COST OF GOES–R PROGRAM

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  We  will  resume.  Admiral,  right  to  you.
Based on NOAA’s scrub of program requirements, what is the esti-
mated  cost  for  the  restructured  GOES–R  program?  Are  you  trying
to  stay  near  the  original  $6.2  billion  estimate,  and,  if  so,  are  you
sacrificing technical capability or advances to stay within this num-
ber?

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  are  trying  to  look  at  a  range  of  op-
tions  so  that  we  can  provide  enough  information  for  the  Secretary
and  for  OMB,  for  the  decision-makers  with  the  Administration,  as
well  as  Congress  in  oversight  role  to  insure  that  we  have  the  best
program that is technologically risk—levels of risk that we can live
with,  that  the  cost  is  reasonable.  We  are  trying  to  obviously  look
for options that are less than the full cost of the 11—roughly $11.2
or $0.4 billion that——

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Is  it  closer  to  $6.2  billion  or  are  you  just

giving us a broad range of $5 billion——

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  am,  and  we  are  at  a  point  where  it
is  hard  to  sit  here  and  say  that.  If  you  ask  me  personally  what  I
am trying to do, I am trying to keep it within about seven to nine.
I  would  like  to  at  least  have  a  range  in  there  for  us  to  discuss  as
we go through the process as to what is reasonable based on what
I know about the program now.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Do you have some feel of the time table of

when this analysis might be concluded?

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  have  to  conclude  this  analysis  in
the  spring  time  because  we  expect  to  get  the  concept  studies—we
have extended the contractors for three months so that we can get
more  information  based  on  the  fact—based  on  this  cost  informa-
tion.  Then  we  will  do  the  independent  cost  estimates  and  set  up  a
program base line. There is no program base line for this. And then
go  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  a  decision  this  summer,  June
to July of 2007. So that is the time frame.

CONGRESS’ CONTINUING OVERSIGHT ROLE

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Let  me  ask  Mr.  Powner,  what  questions
should  this  committee  and  Congress  as  a  whole  continue  to  ask

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

about GOES–R as the program moves forward to insure it remains
on track?

Mr.  POWNER.  Well,  first  of  all,  with  that  cost  estimate,  I  think
there is a fundamental question when we start throwing out num-
bers how many satellites we are considering. That is the first thing
that I think we want to get clear in terms of whether it is four sat-
ellites,  two  satellites,  are  we  at  eleven  or  are  we  at  six  or  are  we
at  the  seven  to  nine  range,  so  that  is  quite  unclear  right  now.
Going  forward,  I  think  there  are  a  couple  of  things  that  we  need
to make sure. We have a number of recommendations in our report
that talks about reconciling different cost estimates. We need a real
clear  independent  cost  estimate  that  is  real  and  that  is  realistic
and not optimistic, so that is the first thing.

The other thing we need going forward is to insure that we have
adequate  systems  engineering  on  this  program.  This  is  a  program
that is going to compete with resources with the NPOESS program.
The  NPOESS  program  still  doesn’t  have  that  management  team
build out, so that is going to be real key when we start holding con-
tractors’  fee  to  the  fire  from  a  technical  perspective.  One  other
thing  to  consider  going  forward  is  the  arrangement  with  NASA.
NASA  right  now  is  responsible  for  the  sensors.  In  terms  of  what
NASA’s  role  is  going  forward  that  is  still  being  negotiated,  and
given  NOAA’s  lack  of  experience  in  acquiring  these  large  satellite
acquisitions,  it  would  make  sense  for  NASA  to  stay  on  board  as
long as possible and help NOAA in this endeavor.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Admiral,  what  do  you  say  in  response  to

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  agree  with  everything  that  has  been
said.  I  think  that  we  should  be  able  to  do  all  the  things  that  he
has asked and——

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  So  the  two  of  you  are  on  the  same  wave

that?

length?

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  believe  we  are  on  the  same  wave
length,  and  we  appreciate  the  independent  view,  and  we  got  an-
other  team  of  independent  experts  and  we  want  the  independent
view  so  that  we  are  doing  the  most  logical  thing  that  we  can  do
to make this program come in.

Chairman BOEHLERT. So you will continue to let the GAO report

be a guide for you?

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Oh, absolutely. Absolutely.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Any 

further  recommendations,  Mr.

Powner, that were not contained in your recommendations?

Mr.  POWNER.  A  couple  other  things  to  consider.  If  you  look  at
what  has  happened  with  dropping  the  HES  satellite,  you  know,
historically DOD has gone to this approach where they are moving
more  to  an  incremental  development  with  satellites.  That  is  some-
thing  that  is  very  common  in  the  technology  world  where  you  de-
ploy  lesser  chunks  of  functionality  more  quickly.  That  hasn’t  been
well accepted or associated with satellite acquisitions because typi-
cally the acquisition cycle is so long. But what we ought to consider
is  taking—we  always  talk  about  these  leaps  in  technology.  We
ought  to  consider  smaller  steps  advancing  the  technology,  and
maybe that would be more realistic going forward.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

One other thing, Mr. Chairman, I think that is important to con-
sider  is  with  NOAA  not  having  much  experience  leading  acquisi-
tions  in  the  satellite  world  there  are  critical  design  reviews
throughout  the  process  that  are  extremely  important  when  we  go
from  preliminary  design  to  development  or  from  development  into
production  modes,  and  it  would  be  very  important  that  there  is
clear criteria that they follow at all those key meetings and if that
is done with rigor, it ought to go on in a forward basis.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much. Mr. Gordon.

RISK OF NOAA’S SOLE PROCUREMENT RESPONSIBILITIES

Mr. GORDON. Mr. Powner, you and your colleagues serve a great
function  for  our  country  and  Congress,  and  I  want  to  thank  you.
You  have  talked,  I  guess,  generally  about  this  but  just  specifically
what do you believe are the greatest risks associated with NOAA’s
decision  to  take  on  sole  procurement  responsibilities  and  what  in-
formation  should  Congress  and  the  public  have  to  insure  that
GOES program remains on track?

Mr.  POWNER.  A  couple  of  key  risks  going  forward.  One,  I  think
it  starts  with  executive  level  involvement.  We  have  a  good  struc-
ture in place right now. It will get more difficult going forward be-
cause  as  the  bad  news  goes  up  the  chain  typically  that  bad  news
isn’t  escalated  well.  So  that  executive  level  involvement  will  need
to  be  in  place  and  we  will  need  to  hold  both  government  and  con-
tractor  personnel  accountable,  so  that  is  one  of  the  key  risks  is
maintaining that involvement throughout.

Another  key  area  is  continuing  to  keep  the  technical  complexity
within  the  bounds  that  are  doable.  I  think  we  have  seen  that  on
the HES sensor but there would also be other technical issues com-
ing  up  with  the  other  sensors.  In  terms  of  what  the  public  needs,
what  the  Congress  and  the  public  needs  going  forward,  I  think  in-
formation  coming  out  of  these  monthly  executive  meetings,  we  can
start with that. We have looked at some of that information. There
is clear identification of risks, what is being done to mitigate those
risks.

Mr.  GORDON.  Excuse  me.  Are  you  copied  on  those?  Do  you  get

pretty much those minutes of those reviews?

Mr. POWNER. Yes, we get those and as part of our reviews we re-

lag time?

quest those and get those key minutes.

Mr. GORDON. Is it pretty much the same time or is it—how much

Mr.  POWNER.  Usually  there  is  some  lag  time  but  it  differs.  I
mean  if  we  look  at  the  NPOESS  program,  we  actually  get  invited
now  to  those  executive  meetings  where  we  are  in  attendance  and
that  is  a  step  in  the  right  direction  where  we  get  timely  informa-
tion that we share with your staff.

PRICE ESTIMATES

Mr.  GORDON.  And  we  talked  a  little  bit  earlier  about  NPOESS
and since you got an understanding in this area, I am a little skep-
tical  of  the  estimate  of  the  $11.4  billion.  What  is  your  feeling  on
that number now?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Mr. POWNER. We have very little details behind the 11.4. I think
these  numbers  that  are  being  thrown  out,  the  6.2,  the  11.4,  the
seven  to  nine,  I  mean  there  are  rough  order  of  magnitudes  right
now,  and  we  don’t  have  detailed  information  behind  those  so  we
don’t have great confidence in those numbers.

Mr. GORDON. Again, thank you for your service.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Mr. Gutknecht.
Mr.  GUTKNECHT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  also  serve  on  the
Government  Reform  Committee,  and  yesterday  we  had  what
amounted  to  our  seventh  hearing  on  some  of  the  waste  and  mis-
management  in  terms  of  the  contracting  relative  to  reconstruction
efforts  in  Iraq.  And  so  compared  to  those  hearings  this  is  like  a
walk  in  the  park,  but  nonetheless  it  seems  to  me  that  this  com-
mittee has a special obligation to see that America’s taxpayers are
well served and we get fair value for the amount of money that we
pay for these things. Admiral Lautenbacher, let me ask you a fairly
simple  question  but  I  hope  you  can  give  us  a  fairly  sophisticated
answer.

IMPROVEMENTS OVER NPOESS PROGRAM

What assurances do we have that senior executive reviews of the
GOES–R  will  be  better  than  we  experienced  with  the  NPOESS
project?

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I think that we have put in place much
more  auditable  processes,  and  that  we  have  a  flow  of  information
which  is,  first  of  all,  there  are  duplicate  channels  of  information
coming up. The flow is much faster. And we have minutes, and we
are  having  reportable  types  of  events  so  it  is  not  trust  me  that  we
are doing this. So these will be there for people to see. We will con-
tinue  to  work  with  the  GAO,  the  IG  in  the  Department  of  Com-
merce,  and  to  make  sure  that  what  we  have  is  open  and  available
and  it  can  be  part  of  a  dialogue  to  insure  that  everybody  is  com-
fortable with doing the best we can.

Mr.  GUTKNECHT.  Mr.  Powner,  let  me  come  back  to  something,
and  I  think  this  is  really  about  overall  management.  Essentially
what  GAO  says  is  that  the  performance  of  the  senior  executive
council  was  really  not  up  to  par,  and  maybe  I  am  being  a  little
harsh on that. What assurances can you give us that they will now
figure  out  how  to  better  manage  this  project  and  the  money  that
they are given?

Mr.  POWNER.  Well,  we  clearly  had  those  findings  related  to  the
NPOESS  acquisition.  Concerning  the  GOES  acquisition,  we  are
early  in  the  acquisition  cycle,  and  what  we  have  seen  on  GOES  is
there is a program management council made up of key executives,
and  they  report  to  the  Admiral.  The  frequency  of  those  meetings
and  the  makeup  of  that  team,  we  have  actually  been  complimen-
tary  to  date  of  the  structure.  I  think  there  are  many  lessons
learned from the NPOESS experience so we are actually—we have
not  been  critical  of  the  executive  level  oversight  on  GOES  to  date.

Mr. GUTKNECHT. Thank you.
Mr.  SCHWARZ.  [Presiding]  The  gentleman  from  Oregon,  Mr.  Wu.
Mr.  WU.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  would  like  to  enter  my

original opening statement into the record.

Mr. SCHWARZ. Without objection.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

CONCERNS ABOUT GOES–R AND SIMILARITIES TO NPOESS

41

Mr.  WU.  And  I  would  like  to  just  make  a  few  comments  based
on  what  I  have  read  about  GOES–R,  what  I  have  been  briefed  on
about  GOES–R,  and  our  prior  experiences  with  NPOESS.  And  the
chairman,  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  Vern  Ehlers,  and  I,  have
worked  very,  very  hard  to  try  to  understand  what  happened  with
NPOESS,  not  so  much  with  the  rear  view  mirror  perspective  of
who  to  blame  but  primarily  looking  out  the  windshield  to  try  to
find  what  we  are  to  learn  from  the  NPOESS  experience  and  how
to  apply  that  to  future  acquisition  programs.  And  from  that  per-
spective,  I  remain  concerned.  I  remain  very,  very  concerned.  The
GAO  report  and  other  materials  seem  to  indicate  that  some  of  the
problems which occurred with NPOESS continue to plague GOES–
R.

Some of those very, very important ones are that the level of risk
in  some  of  the  primary  instruments,  to  mention  ABI  for  one,  is
very,  very  high,  that  some  of  the  instrument  development  and  the
contracts  are  being  let  before  a  prime  contractor  is  selected,  and
that puts the prime contractor sometimes in a position of accepting
what  people  assure  them  will  happen  with  the  instruments  and
their compatibility and their interference with each other, and that
was  a  problem  with  NPOESS  and  that  seems  to  be  repeated  here
with  GOES–R.  The  primary  instrument  is  already  demonstrating
cost overruns as is the overall program, and I have yet to see a lay-
out of what the probability of success is, whether we are facing an
S-shaped  curve,  a  flat  curve  or  a  very  steep  linear  curve  and
whether  these  cost  estimates,  which  have  already  moved  on  us,
whether  they  are  at  the  50  percent  point,  at  the  20  percent  point
or the 80 percent point, and the determination of the shape of that
curve should guide us as to whether some of these contracts should
be  fixed  cost  contracts  or  whether  they  should  be  cost  plus  con-
tracts.

And I for one have not been privy to any of that information. To
the extent that this committee has not been briefed in to that infor-
mation, I would very much like to see that and I would like to turn
it  over  to  Mr.  Powner  and  Administrator  Lautenbacher  for  your
comment and answer.

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. You touched on a lot of subjects, and re-
mind  me,  I  probably  will  not  remember  all  that  you  brought  up,
but  let  us  talk  about  the  GFE  versus  CFE.  What  we  learned  on
NPOESS,  first  of  all,  we  did  try  to  start  the  contracts  on  the  in-
struments  in  NPOESS  early  enough.  It  turns  out  it  wasn’t  early
enough  to  meet  the  schedule  given  the  technological  underesti-
mation that was made at the time when people thought they could
build these instruments, so we have started the instruments. Actu-
ally  there  is  more  time  for  the  GOES–R  instruments  to  be  devel-
oped  based  on  NPOESS.  Now  the  issue  of  the  prime  contractor
being  able  to  manage  this  subcontractor  is  a  huge  one,  and  it  is  a
huge problem we had with NPOESS.

The  concept  at  this  point,  and  I  won’t  say—it  could  change  be-
cause we are still in the preliminary design phase, is that these in-
struments will be GFE. They will be managed by the technical ex-
perts in NASA and they will have government oversight clearly on

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

them  and  we  will  not  be  reliant  on  contractors  to  do  all  of  that
work which has not turned out well in the case of NPOESS. So the
concept is to go in that direction. As far as the cost goes, these are
preliminary estimates. We are still—there is no cost overrun in the
sense there is no baseline yet and nobody is committed to spending
money  that  is  overrunning.  So  we  can  decide  that  now.  We  are  in
that  debate.  We  are  in  that  formative  phase  and  we  want  to  work
with you and provide you as much information as we can so we can
have your thoughts on that.

Mr.  WU.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  and  I  will  take  as  many  of
your  responses  as  you  can  in  writing.  The  red  light  is  on  already.
But  I  am  deeply  concerned  about  this  because  you  all  are  going  to
try  to  do  this  on  your  own,  and,  you  know,  when  I  stepped  into
medical  school  the  dean  in  the  medical  school  said,  you  know,  the
only  true  reward  for  hard  work  and  success  is  a  harder  job.  What
he didn’t say is if you screw up one patient or damage one patient,
you  get  to  work  on  the  President  of  the  United  States  next.  Now
your  track  record  with  NPOESS  has  been  less  than  dramatically
successful, and you are asking us to trust you with a larger project
in essence.

I, for one, have my deep concerns at this point in time, but I look
forward to staying closely in the loop, as I am sure you do, to close-
ly manage this project and this committee to exert the proper over-
sight.

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  agree  with  you,  and  this  is  a  big
project,  and  we  will  do  everything  we  can  to  make  it  successful.
Thank you.

Mr. WU. Thank you.
Mr.  SCHWARZ.  The  gentleman’s  recollection  of  medical  school  is
a little different than my own. I spent four years trying assiduously
to avoid the dean. The gentleman from Texas, Mr. Neugebauer.

NEW TECHNOLOGIES AND INCREASING COSTS

Mr.  NEUGEBAUER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to  back  up
to  Mr.  Wu’s  testimony—the  thing  that  I  think  concerns  me  is  I
have  looked  back  over  the  track  record  and  history  here  is  the
number  of  satellites  keeps  going  down  and  the  number—the  cost
keeps  going  up.  What  kind  of  benchmarks,  number  one,  are  you
putting  in  place,  and,  secondly,  are  we  trying  to  make  this  a  Cad-
illac  when  a  Chevrolet  will  do?  In  other  words,  how  much  incre-
mental benefit are we getting of striving for these new technologies
over what the current technologies are?

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We are absolutely not trying to make it
a  Cadillac,  and  that  is  why  we  have  taken  a  decision  to  defer  one
of these instruments that we know now. I mean we have—at least
I  am  convinced  that  it  is  just  too  much  of  a  step  forward  without
the  proper  development  being  done  so  we  need  to  go  back  and  do
more development. I am going to work with NASA on trying to get
more development. In terms of the number of satellites, the concept
is service on orbit so the contractor can give us options as to having
more  satellites  that  have  less  reliability  or  fewer  satellites  that
have  greater  reliability  and  coverage.  And  part  of  that  is  what  we
are trying to figure out now. That is what these three teams of con-
tractors  are  doing.  They  are  coming  in  with  ideas  on  what  should

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

the  number  of  satellites  be.  Our  concept  is  for  a  coverage  of  a  cer-
tain number of years.

We  want  to  maintain  coverage,  full  coverage,  of  the  United
States for severe weather and our weather models for a certain pe-
riod  of  time.  And  so  some  contractors  say,  well,  we  can  make  our
satellites  last  longer  and  it  is  cheaper  to  us.  We  need  to  examine
that  when  they  come  in  there  with  their  proposals,  so  we  are  not
trying  to  predetermine  the  number  of  satellites.  We  are  trying  to
predetermine the level of service to the United States.

CONTRACTORS ROLE IN THE GOES–R PROJECT

Mr.  NEUGEBAUER.  Well,  and  it  does  nothing—I  guess  the  ques-
tion is as you look at the different models maybe a smaller number,
better  coverage,  at  what  point  in  time  will  there  be  one  contractor
that  will  then  provide  all  of  those  satellites  or  are  you  looking  at
saying here are some long-term solutions, here are short-term solu-
tions, where are you headed?

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  The  way  this  usually  operates,  and  I
am  not  saying  it  can’t  be  changed  or  shouldn’t  be  changed  nec-
essarily  but  we  have  a  series  of  contractors  that  compete  at  a  pre-
liminary  design  stage  to  come  in  with  the  best  concept,  the  best
idea,  and  then  we  take  that  information,  put  our  independent  re-
view  teams  on  it,  cost  teams,  technical  experts,  and  come  up  with
an  RFP  to  come  in  for  people  to—and  they  will  then  compete  for
one contract. That has been the model in satellites that has worked
most  efficiently  rather  than  having  saying  two  manufacturers  that
are  producing  satellites.  The  business  isn’t  big  enough  to  do  that
so  we  end  up  necking  down  to  one  contractor  for  a  series  which
may  last  for  16  to  20  years  of  coverage  and  then  you  go  on  to  the
next one.

Mr.  NEUGEBAUER.  And  in  that  process,  what  kind  of  criteria  are
you  looking  for,  in  other  words,  one,  ability  to  develop  the  product
that  you  ordered  but  secondly  the  track  record  of  that  company’s
ability to deliver that. Particularly you deliver it within the budget
constraints or the price. And I think the question, and I didn’t hear
you  answer  that,  whether  that  was  going  to  be  a  fixed  price  or  if
that was going to be a cost plus.

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  In  terms  of  the  contract  for  the  RFP
that  we  will  put  out  have  not  been  set  yet  so  our  contracting  ex-
perts  or  acquisition  experts  will  sit  down  and  look  at  it.  Previous
contracts have been cost plus because of the technological increases
in  this.  We  have  had  a  fixed  price  contract  for  the  current  series
that  is  up  there  now  that  goes  in  which  we  are  just  starting  to
launch. Unfortunately, the contractor lost money on that and there
was  some  long  discussion  about  how  to  deal  with  that.  So  we
have—all  of  the  concepts  are  in  play  for  either  fixed  price.  A  con-
tractor won’t take on huge leaps in technology obviously for a fixed
price.  My  opinion  again.  We  are  still  in  the  early  part  of  it,  but
most of the time these have been cost plus types of contracts.

Mr.  NEUGEBAUER.  Mr.  Powner,  is  that  right,  I’m  sorry,  what  is
the  GAO’s  experience  in  that  arena  of  your  recommendation  fixed
price versus cost plus?

Mr.  POWNER.  Well,  I  think  it  depends  on  the  circumstances.
Whenever  you  can  push  for  a  fixed  price,  you  clearly  want  to  do

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

that. And there is a question here in terms of how well defined the
technical  complexity  is  going  forward  on  these  sensors  in  the  pro-
gram, whether it allows for a fixed price, or whether there is some
unknowns  that  the  contractors  aren’t  going  to  be  real  receptive  to
accepting  a  fixed  price  consistent  with  what  the  Admiral  men-
tioned.

Mr. NEUGEBAUER. Thank you.
Mr. SCHWARZ. The gentleman from Texas, Mr. Green.
Mr.  GREEN.  Thank  you.  And  I  thank  the  Ranking  Member  and
the Chairman. And, if I may, I would like to make a special presen-
tation  on  behalf  of  the  Members  on  my  side  of  the  aisle  who  are
here  today,  and  with  the  consent  of  my  Ranking  Member.  It  has
been  a  preeminent  privilege  for  me  to  serve  on  this  committee
under the leadership of Chairman Boehlert, and I would like to as
a  small  expression  of  appreciation  present  to  him  this  certificate
and  it  has  a  flag  with  it,  and  I  shall  read  what  the  certificate
bears.

It reads, ‘‘This flag was flown over the United States Capitol and
presented  to  the  Honorable  Sherwood  Boehlert,  Chairman  of  the
U.S. House of Representatives Committee on Science in recognition
of  his  outstanding  service  to  his  country  and  his  leadership  in  the
advancement of science and technology.’’ We do this for several rea-
sons.  One,  of  course,  is  that  he  has  served  us  well.  Yesterday  was
his  birthday,  as  I  understand  it,  his  30th  for  the  second  or  third
time,  but  also  because  he  is  leaving  us.  And  he  has  been  a  real
uniter.  I  have  admired  the  way  he  and  my  Ranking  Member,  soon
to  be  Chairman,  how  they  have  worked  well  together.  And  I  am
just  so  honored  to  be  here  and  to  do  this,  and  so  I  would  like  to
present  this  to  his  staff  member  at  this  time  in  his  absence.  And
I  trust  that  wherever  you  are,  sir,  you  will  remember  that  there
are those of us who will be here, and we will try to as best we can
carry  on  your  good  work,  and  I  thank  you  very  much.  I  yield  back
the balance of my time.

DATA CONTINUITY

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  Mr.  Green  yields  back.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Green.
That is a very kind gesture on your part. My understanding is that
neither Mr. Inglis nor Mr. Diaz-Balart have any questions. For the
record, I don’t want to imply by asking these questions that I have
any  extraordinarily  sophisticated  knowledge  of  this  topic.  I  am  on
the learning curve. But for the record, I have a couple of questions,
Admiral  Lautenbacher,  if  you  don’t  mind.  First,  what  options  are
being  explored  to  insure  data  continuity  for  the  cancelled  sensor?
Are  you  considering  still  providing  improvements  over  current  ca-
pabilities,  just  maybe  not  as  much  of  an  improvement  as  you  had
hoped for?

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. And the answer to that is yes. We want
as an absolute minimum continuation of the current capability and
data. We have begun a study of alternatives to look to see what is
possible  for  improvements  that  will  be  within  the  ability  of  the
technical  community  to  deliver  at  a  cost  and  schedule.  So  we  are
doing a complex study or complete study analysis of alternatives so
we can get somewhere in between hopefully.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Mr. SCHWARZ. And the next question has to do with the users of
the  data  that  is  produced.  How  will  you  involve  the  user  group  in
the  analysis  of  alternatives  for  the  new  GOES–R  program  scope?
Please  be  specific  about  the  process  you  will  use  to  get  input  from
all users of geostationary satellite data.

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  have  a  users  group  which  includes
all  the  users  of  geostationary  satellite  data.  It  has  a  leader  and  a
chairman,  co-chairman,  and  a  process  to  collect  the  information.
The  information  is  reported  to  my  deputy  who  then  brings  it  into
the program office and with our program management council. The
requirements  will  be  then  bounced  against  the  studies  that  come
in  from  the  contractors,  and  we  will  look  at  the  best  arrangement
of  requirements  versus  cost  and  schedule  and  performance  in  that
arena.

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Gordon,  any  further  comments?
Before  we  bring  the  hearing  to  a  close,  I  want  to  thank  our  panel-
ists,  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  Mr.  Powner,  for  testifying  before  the
committee  today  in  the  stead  of  Chairman  Boehlert.  If  there  is  no
objection,  the  record  will  remain  open  for  additional  statements
from  the  Members  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up  questions  the
Subcommittee  may  ask  of  the  panelists.  Without  objection,  so  or-
dered. The hearing is now adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 11:30 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(47)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher,  Jr.  (Ret.),  Under  Secretary  of
Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-
ministration

Questions submitted by Chairman Sherwood L. Boehlert
Q1. In  past  Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  (GOES)  procure-
ments,  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  has  man-
aged  the  procurement  on  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administra-
tion’s (NOAA) behalf. In the past, for GOES–R you have stated that NOAA will
manage  the  procurement,  but  your  testimony  for  this  hearing  states  that  NOAA
is still discussing the procurement model with NASA.

Q1a. Does this mean you are considering returning to having NASA manage the en-

tire procurement?

A1a. No. Previous GOES acquisition and operations programs included both NOAA
and  NASA  contracts  for  the  end-to-end  space  and  ground  systems.  For  the  GOES–
R  program,  NOAA  and  NASA  agree  that  we  must  leverage  the  unique  expertise  of
each  organization.  We  are  also  in  general  agreement  that  the  chosen  management
approach must include a stronger NOAA system program management role than in
prior GOES procurements. However, as part of managing program risks, the acqui-
sition strategy is one of the things being discussed with NASA and reviewed by our
Independent Review Team.
Q1b. What  options  are  you  reviewing  concerning  the  assignment  of  specific  tasks  to

NOAA and NASA?

A1b. NOAA  and  NASA  have  agreed  in  principle  on  a  framework  in  which  NOAA
retains  overall  program  management  authority.  As  noted  in  our  testimony,  the
spacecraft  instruments  will  now  be  treated  as  Government  Furnished  Equipment
(GFE)  and  NASA  will  continue  to  manage  those  procurements.  The  options  under
consideration  with  NASA  and  the  Independent  Review  Team  involve  management
structure and acquisition strategy. Any recommendations resulting from this process
will need to be reviewed by NOAA senior management, the Department, and NASA
policy officials before any decisions are made.
Q1c. When  do  you  expect  the  Memorandum  of  Understanding  (MOU)  between  the

agencies to be completed and signed?

A1c. We are working to get the Interagency Agreement in place as soon as possible.
Q1d. If the details of the MOU are already generally in place, please clarify the rela-
tionship  between  NOAA  and  NASA  with  regard  to  the  GOES–R  procurement
by specifically explaining each agency’s responsibility for each component of the
program,  including  the  overall  procurement,  and  provide  specific  details  re-
garding the proposed MOU between the agencies that will govern the relation-
ship.

A1d. The proposed MOU will be signed by the NOAA Deputy Under Secretary and
the NASA Deputy Administrator and will govern all managerial and acquisition as-
pects of the NOAA/NASA GOES–R relationship. Its content is very similar in scope
to NOAA/NASA MOUs governing the current NOAA/NASA relationship for existing
operational environmental satellite programs.

Specific roles and responsibilities of NOAA and NASA will be delineated and for-
mally  documented.  While  specific  details  are  being  negotiated,  it  is  agreed  that
NOAA will provide the overall System Program Director (SPD), who will be respon-
sible  for  overall  program  management.  NASA  will  provide  key  project  leads  sup-
porting the SPD. The MOU outlines funding responsibilities, agreement on payment
of  NASA  administrative  fees,  and  in-kind  provisions  such  as  sufficient  office  space
at the Goddard Spaceflight Center for the GOES–R program office.

In addition to the MOU, NOAA and NASA will complete lower-level management

plans that will implement the MOU.
Q2. Did you ask for feedback from users or contractors prior to making the decision
not  to  let  the  contract  for  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite  (HES)?  If  so,
what was the process and timeline for soliciting feedback from users or contrac-
tors? What specific reaction to the decision, if any, did you receive from the users
and contractors?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

A2. The process we used to address the GOES–R affordability issue this spring and
summer  included  user  representation  at  every  step.  Government  users  were  rep-
resented  on  the  NOAA/NASA  Team  that  developed  and  analyzed  the  baseline  pro-
gram and possible alternatives. The review process for the results of the Team effort
included  the  GOES–R  Operational  Requirements  Working  Group  (GORWG)  and
NOAA Observing Systems Council (NOSC). Contractor data regarding the technical
risks  and  costs  of  HES  and  reduced  capability  alternatives,  such  as  the  removal  of
the  coastal  waters  requirements,  was  utilized  in  the  assessment  of  the  costs  and
benefits of the GOES–R alternatives.

The  users  strongly  endorsed  having  advanced  sounding  capabilities  like  HES  but
also  endorsed  the  decisions  regarding  HES  in  the  context  of  the  GOES–R  require-
ments  priorities,  resources  available,  associated  risks,  and  the  programmatic  alter-
natives available. The contractors were disappointed with the decision and have ex-
pressed interest in supporting efforts to continue advanced sounding efforts.
Q3. Did you consider making minor changes to the HES requirements instead of out-
right cancellation? If so, why didn’t those minor changes work to reduce the risk
and expense?

A3. During  the  on-going  HES  Program  Definition  and  Risk  Reduction  (PDRR)
phase a number of studies were conducted looking at ways to reduce the cost of HES
including changes and/or reductions. However, the core requirements for the sound-
ing and coastal waters capabilities results in an instrument architecture with a cer-
tain size and technical complexity. This instrument complexity along with the space-
craft  accommodations  and  ground  processing  to  produce  the  associated  products  re-
sulted in a risk that was inconsistent with NOAA’s operational requirements.
Q4. One  of  the  GOES–R  independent  review  teams  has  been  looking  at  HES  and  is
due  to  report  to  about  it  this  fall.  Also,  the  contractors  competing  to  build  HES
have  until  December  2006  to  complete  their  preliminary  design  concepts  for  the
instrument.  You  made  the  decision  to  cancel  this  sensor  before  the  independent
review  team  gave  you  their  final  report  and  before  the  contractors  completed
their preliminary design concepts for the instrument.

Q4a. When you made the decision to cancel HES, what information did you consider
with  respect  to  cost,  schedule  and  technical  issues  and  minimum  user  require-
ments?

A4a. We  assessed  the  technical,  cost  and  schedule  risks  associated  with  the  entire
HES system, which included the instrument, spacecraft integration and ground data
processing  risks.  Assessment  participants  included  the  full  range  of  GOES–R  pro-
gram participants: NOAA and NASA government personnel, the Program Definition
and Risk Reduction (PDRR) contractor teams, and in-house support contractors. We
considered  the  schedule  for  HES,  which  did  not  support  the  first  GOES–R  launch
date. Our conclusion was that the technical maturity of the HES design was not suf-
ficient  enough  to  be  flown  on  an  operational  spacecraft.  We  retained  the  require-
ment to maintain sounding capability equivalent to that of the present GOES space-
craft. Together with our users, we are presently assessing alternative technical solu-
tions  to  meet  these  requirements.  This  assessment  is  on-going  and  is  in  the  initial
stages.  When  completed  in  February  2007,  it  will  allow  NOAA  to  determine  what
alternatives  might  go  forward  for  further  study.  Mechanisms  for  external  agencies
to provide input is through the GOES–R Operational Requirements Working Group
(GORWG),  the  NOAA  Observing  Systems  Council  (NOSC),  various  NOAA  Goal
Teams, as well as the NOAA Cooperative Institutes at the University of Wisconsin,
Colorado State University, and Oregon State University.
Q4b. Why  didn’t  you  wait  until  the  independent  review  and  the  final  designs  were

available to make your decision about HES?

A4b. Concerns  about  HES  technical,  cost,  and  schedule  risks  became  apparent  fol-
lowing the PDRR System Requirement Reviews (SRRs) which occurred in the spring
of 2006. Each of the three contractor teams expressed concerns about the HES and
recommended that the GOES–R program office make a decision about HES as soon
as  possible.  The  Independent  Review  Team  had  also  begun  its  work  at  that  time
and  had  also  raised  concerns  about  the  HES  risks.  Subsequent  work  in-house  and
with  the  contractors  refined  those  initial  concerns.  We  used  this  information  to
make the decision to remove HES from GOES–R.

By  making  the  decision  in  the  late  summer,  we  minimized  impacts  on  the  PDRR
contracts  and  were  able  to  provide  direction  to  the  contractors  to  modify  their  con-
cepts to reflect the re-scoping decisions. The timing of our decision took into account

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

detailed  technical  analysis  that  confirmed  earlier  concerns,  minimized  impacts  to
the PDRR contracts and overall program schedule.
Q4c. Did you seek the input of this independent review team and/or the contractors

in making that decision?

A4c. Following the first two Independent Review Team reviews of the GOES–R pro-
gram,  the  IRT  expressed  concern  about  the  HES  risks  and  suggested  that  develop-
ment risks for HES exceeded those of an operational satellite system. Concurrently,
our  program  definition  and  risk  reduction  (PDRR)  prime  contractor  competitive
teams  had  each  expressed  concern  about  HES  development  risk.  Both  of  these  in-
puts weighed heavily in our decision.
Q5. In  your  testimony  you  mentioned  that  one  of  the  reasons  for  not  building  HES
is  that  it  will  affect  the  ground  system.  Please  provide  specific  examples  of  how
HES would affect the GOES–R ground system and why this led to your decision
to not build the sensor.

A5. The  magnitude  and  complexity  of  the  additional  software  and  hardware  re-
quired to produce the HES sounder and coastal waters products was one of several
factors influencing our decision to eliminate the HES. By taking an overall systems
approach  to  the  HES  decision,  we  were  able  to  make  a  system-level  determination
of HES risks. GOES–R ground system experts determined that eliminating HES-re-
lated  algorithms  and  supporting  computer  hardware  and  software  accounted  for  an
approximate  40  percent  decrease  in  ground  system  complexity.  In  addition  to  non-
recurring  development  costs,  recurring  costs  which  required  periodic  upgrade  and
maintenance of the ground system were proportionally reduced.
Q6. In  your  testimony  you  stated  that  the  GOES–R  User  Group  meets  regularly  to

review the program.

Q6a. Please supply a list of members of the User Group.
A6a. The  primary  User  Group  is  the  GOES  Operational  Requirements  Working
Group (GORWG); membership consists of:

• Senior Representative from primary user National Weather Service (Chair)
• GOES–R Senior Scientist
• Senior representatives from the four Major NOAA Goal Teams:

• Senior  representatives  from  NOAA  HQ  staff  elements  and  Operating

• Weather and Water
• Climate
• Commerce and Transportation
• Ecosystems

Branches:

• Program Planning and Integration
• Programs, Analysis, and Evaluation

The  GORWG  reports  to  the  NOAA  Observing  Systems  Council  (NOSC).  The

NOSC consists of:

• Assistant Administrator (AA) for Weather Services (Co-Chair)
• Assistant Administrator for Satellite and Information Services (Co-Chair) and
• Senior Representatives from NOAA Line Offices and staffs:

senior staff members

• Chief Information Officer
• Office of Marine and Aviation Operations
• National Marine Fisheries Service
• National Ocean Service
• National Weather Service
• Office of Oceanic and Atmospheric Research
• Programs, Analysis, and Evaluation
• Plans, Programs, and Integration
Q6b. How often does the User Group meet?
A6b. Currently  the  GORWG  meets  every  two  weeks.  The  NOSC  meets  monthly  or
as necessary.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Q6c. What type of information does the User Group review?
A6c. The GORWG reviews information at all phases of the GOES–R program.

51

• Requirements  Identification  Phase:  Reviews  higher-level  user  observational
requirements for possible allocation to geostationary satellite systems such as
GOES–R.

• Program  Definition  and  Design  Risk  Reduction  (PDRR)  Phase:  Reviews  sys-
tem  alternatives  proposed  by  the  GOES  Program  Office  (GPO)  to  assure  re-
quirements are satisfied.

• Acquisition  and  Operations  (A&O)  Phase:  Will  monitor  and  assess  the  pro-
gram  during  manufacturing  and  test  to  assess  the  ability  of  the  program  to
meet requirements.

Q6d. Is  there  a  standard  procedure  in  place  for  the  GOES–R  program  office  to  seek
the  input  of  the  User  Group  regarding  possible  modifications  to  user  require-
ments if the GOES–R program encounters cost, schedule or technical problems
going forward?

A6d. Yes.  The  primary  senior  management  decision-making  body  for  GOES–R  is
the  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  (PMC).  Many  of  the  same  organizations
who have members on the NOSC, also have members on the PMC. The NOAA Dep-
uty Under Secretary (DUS) is the PMC chair.

GOES–R issues surfacing at the PMC meetings requiring user input are assigned
as  action  items  to  the  NOSC,  which  evaluates  all  user-specific  concerns  and  makes
a  recommendation  to  the  DUS.  The  DUS  brings  the  recommendation  to  the  PMC
for  a  decision.  Similarly,  issues  arising  through  the  NOSC  affecting  GOES–R  are
sent to the PMC for resolution.
Q6e. Is there a process for the User Group to submit grievances about GOES–R pro-
gram decisions? If so, what is this procedure? If not, do you think such a proce-
dure would benefit the program?

A6e. Yes, a process exists. Users can independently raise issues about GOES–R de-
cisions through the GORWG and NOSC if consensus cannot be reached at the work-
ing  level.  The  decision  authority  is  the  NOAA  Administrator  (Under  Secretary  of
Commerce for Oceans and Atmosphere).
Q6f. Does the User Group operate under the Federal Advisory Committee Act?
A6f. No.  The  NOSC  and  GORWG  were  organized  by  direction  and  authority  of  the
NOAA Administrator. These groups are not required to be established under FACA
since their members are all federal employees.
Q7. What  has  NOAA  done  to  identify  a  minimum  set  of  requirements  for  Advanced
Baseline  Imager  (ABI)  and  other  critical  sensors  on  GOES–R?  If  you  run  into
serious technical problems with ABI, will you consider scaling back the require-
ments for the sensor? If so, do you have a strategy choosing which requirements
will be reduced or eliminated?

A7. NOAA  has  identified  GOES–R  top-level  system  requirements  in  the  GOES–R
Level 1 requirements document which is presently in draft form. Following comple-
tion of the PDRR phase of the GOES–R acquisition program, the Deputy Under Sec-
retary (DUS) will approve the Level 1 requirements document in its final form after
NOSC formal review and concurrence. If we consider reducing ABI requirements in
the  future,  we  would  follow  the  same  procedures  as  we  did  for  the  HES,  which
would result in a coordinated approach presented to the DUS for approval.
Q8. In  your  testimony  you  explained  that  a  group  of  senior  NOAA  officials,  the

NOAA Program Management Council, meets monthly to review GOES–R.

Q8a. What kind of information does the Council review?
A8a. The  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  (PMC)  provides  the  forum  for  reg-
ular  review  and  assessment  of  selected  NOAA  programs  and  projects.  The  PMC  is
a decision-making body which is chaired by the Deputy Under Secretary.

The  PMC  is  briefed  on  monthly  assessments  of  performance  versus  plan  in  the

following areas:

• Technical  Performance—actual  versus  planned  performance,  risk  identifica-

tion and mitigation strategies

• Budget  Performance—actual  versus  planned  costs  (Earned  value),  status  of

funds, budget threats, budget reserves posture

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

• Schedule  Performance—critical  path  analysis,  changes  since  last  month,

schedule threats, schedule reserves posture

Additional responsibilities include:

• Reviewing proposed new activities and/or scope to ensure risk, schedule, inte-
gration and budget impacts to existing programs are understood and realistic
• Commissioning  independent  assessments  as  needed,  and  reviewing  both  the
results  of  the  independent  assessment  and  reviewing  and  approving  the  pro-
gram/project’s proposed response plan

• Recommending alternative actions, including termination of programs/projects

or activities within programs/projects, when appropriate.

Q8b. The Government Accountability Office (GAO) recommends this group review the
results  of  all  preliminary  studies  and  independent  assessments  on  technical
maturity of the satellite instruments. Will the Council review those studies and
assessments? If not, why not?

A8b. NOAA agreed with the GAO recommendation and noted that the PMC has al-
ready  addressed  GOES–R  schedule,  technical  and  cost  issues.  Instrument  design
and acquisition status is reviewed at every PMC.
Q9. In  your  testimony  you  say  that  you  meet  regularly  with  your  Deputy  to  discuss
GOES–R.  How  often  do  these  meetings  occur?  What  materials  do  you  review  at
these meetings? For example, do you review the independent review team reports
and  cost  estimates,  or  do  you  review  summaries  of  the  reports  and  cost  esti-
mates?

A9. The NOAA Deputy Under Secretary (DUS) is in charge of the Program Manage-
ment  Council  (PMC),  which  oversees  management  of  the  GOES–R  Program  at  its
monthly meetings. The DUS and Under Secretary of Commerce for Oceans and At-
mosphere  meet  weekly  to  discuss  a  range  of  issues,  including  GOES–R.  In  these
meetings,  they  discuss  information  from  the  PMC,  as  well  as  available  updated  in-
formation.  The  Under  Secretary  also  holds  meetings  on  key  GOES–R  related  top-
ics—such as on information from the independent review team or regarding the re-
structure of the GOES–R program—as often as necessary. The Under Secretary has
had  discussions  directly  with  Tom  Young,  the  Chair  of  the  Independent  Review
Team, twice. Monthly satellite-related meetings are being formalized where the As-
sistant  Administrator  for  Satellite  and  Information  Services  can  brief  the  Under
Secretary  and  the  DUS  on  current  issues  pertaining  to  NOAA’s  satellite  programs.
Q10. In  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System
(NPOESS)  program,  the  critical  design  review  (CDR)  for  the  Visible  Infrared
Imager  Radiometer  Suite  was  conducted  without  building  a  full  engineering
design unit. Now GAO has expressed concern about inadequate plans for tech-
nical  review  of  the  key  GOES–R  sensor,  the  ABI,  especially  at  important  deci-
sion  points.  Will  a  full  engineering  design  unit  be  built  prior  to  CDR’s  of  the
GOES–R  sensors,  in  particular  of  ABI?  If  not,  why  not  and  in  that  case  what
specific  steps  will  be  taken  to  ensure  that  the  CDR’s  are  sufficiently  rigorous?

A10. Yes, for GOES–R, more rigorous design reviews are already incorporated.

Additionally,  we  are  applying  NASA  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  (GSFC)  Office
of  Systems  Safety  and  Mission  Assurance  Systems  Review  Office  guidelines,  and
have  adopted  all  NASA  and  NASA  GSFC  technical,  management,  safety,  and  mis-
sion  assurance  processes  into  the  GOES–R  program  management  structure  and
processes.

The decision to build an engineering development unit (EDU) is tied to the instru-
ment’s complexity and cost. The Advanced Baseline Imager (ABI) development con-
tract  includes  a  requirement  for  an  EDU,  as  well  as  additional  engineering  models
of critical components. EDUs will also be developed for each instrument in the Solar
Imaging Suite (SIS) and the Space Environment In-Situ Suite (SEISS).

Because the final instrument, the Geostationary Lightning Mapper (GLM), is still
in  the  formulation  phase,  we  have  not  yet  determined  if  complexity,  cost  and  tech-
nical risk requires an EDU.
Q11. In  your  testimony  you  say  you  have  hired  a  team  of  independent  satellite  ex-

perts to provide periodic reviews of GOES–R.

Q11a. How often will the independent team review the program? On a regular basis

or just at key decision points?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

A11a. NOAA  has  established  a  GOES–R  Independent  Review  Team  (IRT)  com-
prised of senior industry and government space acquisition experts. This group will
support four review tasks:

1) adequacy of current activities to support GOES–R objectives,
2) readiness of program to proceed into development phase,
3) annual progress reviews during development phase, and
4) review of major development milestones.

The IRT will meet and provide advice to support all major program decisions. Ad-
ditionally, the IRT Chairman has held one-on-one meetings with senior Department
of Commerce officials, and the Under Secretary of Commerce for Oceans and Atmos-
phere and the Deputy Under Secretary.
Q11b. What  aspects  of  GOES–R  will  the  independent  team  review—i.e.,  the  entire

program, specific issues or sensors?

A11b. The  independent  reviews  will  address  the  entire  GOES–R  program  and  con-
sider,  as  appropriate,  technical,  programmatic,  and  management  areas  to  highlight
risks and recommend actions.
Q11c. What type of products will the independent team provide to NOAA?
A11c. The  IRT  will  produce  recommendations  that  will  be  presented  to  NOAA  and
NASA management through their respective Program Management Councils.
Q12. In  May  2006  you  testified  to  this  committee  about  an  Inspector  General  report
on  NPOESS.  As  part  of  that  report,  NOAA  is  required  to  develop  a  Corrective
Action  Plan  about  how  it  will  implement  the  IG  recommendations.  That  plan,
required by July 11, is still not complete. When do you expect to finish the Cor-
rective Action Plan for NPOESS and why has it been delayed?

A12. The original action plan was transmitted from the NOAA Administrator to the
Department of Commerce Inspector General on July 7, 2006. The plan was modified
and resubmitted for IG approval on September 29, 2006. The revision was necessary
to clarify details in the action plan.
Q13. GOES–R was originally estimated to cost $6.2 billion. During the hearing, you
attributed the cost estimate growing to roughly $11 billion to (1) a $2.6 billion
inflation cost, (2) $800,000 for management reserve, and (3) $1.58 billion more
for sensor development. Also, you said that now NOAA is restructuring the pro-
gram  and  that  you  expect  costs  of  the  restructured  program  to  be  between  $7–
$9 billion. Since the three growth factors (inflation, management reserves, and
complex sensor development) are likely to still be factors under the restructured
program, what, if any, cost reduction on these factors do you expect by restruc-
turing the program?

A13. The restructured program resulted in the elimination of the HES and a reduc-
tion  in  the  number  of  spacecraft.  The  reduction  in  satellites,  and  instruments,  im-
pacted costs for ground operations and life cycle support costs. The $11 billion figure
was  a  preliminary  estimate  for  one  potential  system  configuration.  The  restruc-
turing  addresses  not  only  configuration  changes,  but  also  the  assumptions  used  in
the  preliminary  cost  estimate.  While  inflation  and  management  reserve  costs  are
likely  to  still  be  growth  factors  under  the  restructured  program,  improvements  in
the cost assumptions could result in reductions from the preliminary estimate.
Q14. NOAA’s restructured program reduces the numbers of satellites purchased from
four to two. Since the Nation will still need those later two satellites, isn’t this
exercise  simply  deferring  the  costs  in  order  to  come  up  with  an  acceptably  low
cost estimate? What are the benefits of purchasing two instead of four satellites,
other than reducing the program’s overall cost?

A14. No.  Given  the  longer  on-orbit  design  life  planned  for  the  GOES–R  series  sat-
ellites, the two satellites are designed to provide continuous GOES operational cov-
erage for a period comparable to that expected of the GOES–N series with three sat-
ellites.  Two  is  considered  a  minimum  number  of  satellites  for  the  initial  buy.  The
second satellite must be in production and available in case there is a problem with
the launch of the first satellite. This approach supports our initial acquisition needs
and  provides  an  opportunity  for  performance  based  decisions  associated  with  the
procurement of additional satellites.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. NOAA  had  an  option  with  the  current  GOES  series  contractor  to  purchase  an

additional satellite—Q—in the current series.

Q1a. Why did NOAA choose not to exercise the option to build this satellite?
A1a. The  following  considerations  influenced  NOAA’s  decision  to  not  exercise  the
option on the GOES–N series contract for a GOES Q satellite:

• The  GOES  I–M  series  of  satellites  were  lasting  longer  than  originally
planned. NOAA wanted to delay launching the GOES N series satellites, but
given  the  fixed  price  contract  for  these  satellites,  delaying  launches  would
have  required  renegotiating  the  contract  with  Boeing  and  would  have  in-
creased the costs of the satellites.
• During  this  same  timeframe,  Boeing  approached  the  government  with  an
offer  to  upgrade  the  GOES  N  series  launch  vehicles  from  Delta  III’s  to  the
newer  Delta  IV’s  in  exchange  for  not  exercising  the  GOES  Q  option.  The
switch  to  the  larger  launch  vehicle  was  attractive  to  the  government—the
larger  launch  vehicle  was  able  to  accommodate  a  heavier  satellite  with  more
fuel.  The  additional  fuel  would  allow  us  to  extend  the  on-orbit  life  of  each  of
the  GOES  N,  O  and  P  satellites  by  three  to  four  years.  This  would  have  al-
lowed  us  to  launch  each  satellite  as  contracted  for,  but  to  store  them  longer
and  put  them  in  to  operation  only  when  they  were  needed—when  the  GOES
I series satellites were failing. Moving to the Delta IV, although more expen-
sive,  was  overall  more  advantageous  to  the  GOES  program,  and  the  on-orbit
life of the satellites.

Given these considerations, NOAA decided to accept the offer to move the GOES–
N  series  to  the  larger  launch  vehicle  in  exchange  for  not  exercising  the  Q  option.
Q1b. What was the incremental cost for the additional satellite?
A1b. The  cost  to  exercise  the  GOES  Q  option  in  the  GOES–N  series  contract  was
$185 million. This option is no longer available to be exercised.
Q1c. How  many  more  years  would  the  current  GOES  series  have  extended  had
NOAA bought GOES–Q? Given the large initial cost for any new satellite series,
why  shouldn’t  we  purchase  more  satellites  in  a  series  to  achieve  some  economy
of scale?

A1c. Based  on  a  detailed  technical  and  parametric  analysis  of  actual  and  projected
spacecraft  lifetime,  the  final  spacecraft  in  the  GOES–N  series  (GOES–P)  was  pre-
dicted to reach its end of life in approximately the spring of 2019. The option to pur-
chase  and  launch  an  additional  GOES–N  class  spacecraft  would  provide  an  addi-
tional  five  years  of  design  life,  but  since  there  are  two  operational  spacecraft  at  a
time  it  would  extend  the  projected  end  of  the  GOES–N  class  constellation  lifetime
only  slightly  more  than  two  years,  requiring  a  GOES–R  launch  readiness  date  of
April  2016.  In  addition,  extending  the  GOES–N  series  by  exercising  the  option  on
GOES  Q  would  have  delayed  the  opportunity  to  introduce  new  technology  in  the
next series, such as the improved imaging capability of the ABI.
Q2. Weather  forecasting  can  be  improved  with  improved  observations  and  data  col-
lection—essentially  by  building  more  advanced  satellite  systems—but  we  can
also  improve  weather  forecasting  by  using  the  data  we  already  collect  in  new
ways through improvement of our forecast models.

Q2a. How do these different investments compare in terms of their cost effectiveness?
A2a. Investments  in  geostationary  satellite  observations  have  shown  value  in  both
numerical  weather  prediction  and  nowcasting  (forecasting  based  on  satellite  anal-
ysis  and  interpretation).  In  order  to  continue  with  this  level  of  improvement,  new
satellites  with  increased  capabilities  are  needed  to  meet  requirements  of  the  user
community.

Unfortunately,  we  are  not  aware  of  any  study  conducted  to  quantify  the  percent-
age of improvements in weather forecasting expected from the improved data (reso-
lution, quality and speed of transmission) as satellite technology has advanced (e.g.,
as we transition from the GOES–I series to the GOES–N series).
Q2b. How much improvement in forecasting could we achieve with more investment

in data analysis and forecast modeling?

A2b. Targeted  investments,  as  we  have  made  over  the  years,  have  improved  fore-
cast  accuracy  as  reflected  in  our  improving  performance  measures.  These  are  pub-
lished annually by the Department in NOAA’s annual performance plan that is inte-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

grated with the President’s Budget submission. Much of the improvement has come
from investments in human resources to support data analysis and modeling as well
as investments in better observation systems.
Q2c. What is NOAA’s estimate of improvements in weather forecasting from the tech-

nological advancements incorporated into GOES–R?

A2c. GOES–R  will  provide  increased  and  more  rapid  area  coverage  with  improved
resolution  and  additional  spectral  coverage  using  Advanced  Baseline  Imager  (ABI)
and  provide  lightning  data  from  the  GOES  Lightning  Mapper  (GLM).  These  im-
proved capabilities provide more frequent, accurate and timely products supporting:

• two to ten percent improvement in hurricane track forecast
• Ability  to  track  severe  storms  while  simultaneously  maintaining  coverage  of

the entire hemisphere

Q2d. How  much  has  NOAA  invested  in  research  on  model  improvement  during  the

past decade?

A2d. During  the  period  1997  to  2006,  NOAA  invested  the  following  in  operational
weather model improvements:

In  the  FY  2007  President’s  Budget,  NOAA  investment  in  operational  weather

model improvements is as follows:

Q3. The  development  and  incorporation  of  new  sensors  into  an  operational  system
assumes  some  demonstration  of  their  feasibility  through  research  and  develop-
ment  programs.  What  is  the  state  of  these  research  and  development  programs?
Exactly how much does heritage design inform the development of each new sen-
sor for GOES–R?

A3. The  Advanced  Baseline  Imager  (ABI)  provides  significantly  improved  and  new
capabilities  and  contains  the  majority  of  the  GOES–R  technical  risk.  The  technical
risk  for  ABI  derives  from  the  specific  engineering  applications  of  the  proven  space-
qualified components that have flown before. For example, the technology for critical
ABI elements such as detectors and high data rate interfaces, have been used before
in space instruments.

The  Solar  Environmental  in  Situ  Suite  (SEISS)  and  Solar  Imaging  Suite  (SIS)
represent  evolutionary  extensions  of  prior  SEISS  and  SIS  instruments  with  modest
enhancements.

The GOES Lightning Mapper (GLM) is based on instruments that have flown pre-
viously in polar-orbits. We will not be able to determine the extent to which heritage
design can be used until the completion of the GLM formulation phase in 2007.
Q4. How  are  changing  priorities  in  earth  science  programs  at  NASA  affecting
NOAA’s ability to improve sensor design, given NOAA’s reliance on NASA’s tech-
nical  support  in  GOES  satellite  development,  and  the  use  of  NASA  missions  to
test prototype sensor performance?

A4. One  benefit  GOES–R  received  from  previous  NASA  Earth  science  missions  is
data from those missions incorporated into algorithms and computer simulations in
order  to  predict  performance  of  GOES–R  instruments  and  to  assess  design  options.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

In addition, NOAA and NASA have been working together to develop a Geosynchro-
nous  Imaging  Fourier  Transform  Spectrometer  (GIFTS)  Engineering  Development
Unit  (EDU)  to  validate  key  technologies  and  algorithms  for  potential  use  in  ad-
vanced  weather  observing  systems,  including  GOES–R;  this  GIFTS  EDU  activity
was intended, in part, to provide risk reduction for the GOES–R Hyperspectral En-
vironmental  Suite  (HES)  acquisition.  While  originally  designed  as  a  full  flight  mis-
sion,  the  project  had  to  be  rescoped  following  the  withdrawal  from  the  program  of
the U.S. Navy. A NOAA–NASA/Langley Research Center Interagency Agreement to
build  and  test  the  GIFTS  EDU  was  signed  in  late  2004.  All  activities  associated
with  the  GIFTS  EDU  should  be  completed  by  the  end  of  December  2006.  The  first-
ever  Decadal  Survey  in  Earth  Science  by  the  National  Research  Council  is  nearing
completion.  When  released,  this  decadal  survey  will  provide  the  U.S.  Earth  science
community’s priorities for the next decade. Any impact of those priorities on the de-
velopment of sensors for geostationary operational satellites will not be known until
after the Decadal Survey is released and the resulting missions are fully understood
and integrated into NASA’s long-range planning.
Q5. Your  testimony  stated  that  NOAA  has  decided  to  provide  individual  sensors  to
the prime contractor as Government Furnished Equipment (GFE). What are the
benefits of this type of arrangement? What are the risks associated with this type
of arrangement?

A5. GOES–R instruments are being delivered to the future prime contractor as gov-
ernment-furnished equipment. The dominant major benefit is direct government vis-
ibility  of  instrument  design  status  and  technical  issues  that  would  not  be  readily
available  if  the  prime  contractor  was  delivering  instruments  through  subcontracts.
The resulting risk to the GFE approach is that the government must possess the
necessary  level  of  expertise  to  perform  technical  oversight.  The  capabilities  and  ex-
isting resources of the NASA Goddard Space Flight Center to perform this function
mitigate this risk.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management

Issues, Government Accountability Office

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. Admiral  Lautenbacher’s  testimony  indicated  that  NOAA  has  decided  to  provide
individual sensors to the prime contractor as Government Furnished Equipment
What are the benefits of this type of arrangement? What are the risks of this type
of arrangement?

A1. An  arrangement  in  which  critical  components  are  provided  to  the  prime  con-
tractor  as  Government  Furnished  Equipment  (GFE)  is  designed  to  provide  the  gov-
ernment  with  a  better  view  into  the  development  of  those  components.  If  executed
properly,  this  arrangement  could  be  an  effective  and  efficient  approach  for  NOAA
to  take  and  could  help  the  agency  avoid  several  of  the  key  management  problems
experienced on the National Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite Sys-
tem (NPOESS). Specifically, on the NPOESS program, the prime contractor had the
lead responsibility for overseeing subcontractors’ development of critical sensors and
the  government  had  limited  insight  into  important  acquisition  management  and
program  control  functions,  including  the  execution  of  the  master  schedule,  earned
value  management  system,  and  independent  cost  estimating.  A  GFE  arrangement
could  improve  NOAA’s  role  in  the  timely  identification  and  resolution  of  emerging
technical  and  schedule  problems,  management  of  reserve  funds,  and  decision  mak-
ing processes.

While the potential benefits of a GFE arrangement are significant, there are also
risks associated with this approach if the government does not have sufficient tech-
nical capacity and skills. In particular, NOAA needs to have adequate and effective
program  control  capabilities  in  the  areas  of  systems  engineering  and  earned  value
management  in  order  to  effectively  oversee  contractor  performance  in  the  develop-
ment of the sensors.
Q2. NOAA is proposing to reduce the number of satellites in the GOES–R series and
simplify  them.  However,  the  current  unofficial  estimate  appears  to  be  in  the
range  of  the  original  estimate  for  four  satellites  with  more  advanced  sensors
(over $6 billion). This estimate appears to be high for two satellites. What factors
do you believe are driving the costs of these systems up to these levels?

A2. Senior  NOAA  officials  stated  that  they  are  unable  to  provide  a  current  unoffi-
cial  estimate  of  the  restructured  GOES–R  program,  noting  that  they  need  more
analysis  to  determine  this  cost.  Thus,  the  factors  that  affect  the  cost  of  the  system
are  still  being  determined.  However,  based  on  discussions  with  the  agency,  we  be-
lieve the original estimate of $6.2 billion (for four satellites) was low because of opti-
mistic  assumptions  made  on  the  technical  complexity  of  the  system’s  components,
including key sensors.
Q3. Your  testimony  included  several  things  that  NOAA  still  needs  to  do  to  imple-
ment  the  lessons  learned  from  other  satellite  programs.  One  of  these  is  that
NOAA needs to determine how to ensure that a sufficient level of technical matu-
rity will be achieved in time for a decision milestone. Are there particular meth-
ods, processes or other steps NOAA should take to address this issue?

A3. Our  work  on  lessons  learned  from  other  satellite  acquisitions  noted  the  impor-
tance  of  fully  understanding  the  technology  before  awarding  a  contract  to  develop
that  technology,  and  ensuring  that  there  has  been  sufficient  design  work  and  tech-
nical  maturity  prior  to  deciding  to  move  the  technology  into  production.  The  proc-
esses that should be taken to ensure a sufficient amount of technical readiness1 in-
clude  the  review  of  engineering  hardware  design,  development  approach,  and  test
results for the development phase, and the subsequent assessment of technical ma-
turity  that  has  been  achieved  for  the  production  phase.  In  moving  forward,  it  will
be important for NOAA to ensure that the exit criteria for key decision milestones—
called  the  preliminary  and  critical  design  reviews,  respectively—include  these  proc-
esses and are clearly defined and measurable. NOAA has taken positive steps to ad-
dress  this  lesson  by  obtaining  the  services  of  an  independent  review  team  to  verify

1 The  GOES–R  program  office  uses  a  tool  known  as  Technology  Readiness  Levels  (TRL)  to
measure  the  level  of  technical  maturity  of  technologies  that  reside  in  key  satellite  components.
The levels of maturity range from 1 to 9 based on the demonstrated performance of these tech-
nologies-from paper studies to proven performance on the intended product.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

and validate program office decisions on technical maturity. However, NOAA should
also ensure that there is effective executive oversight of what is accomplished at key
decision  points.  In  particular,  it  is  important  that  the  executive  leadership  exercise
diligence in questioning program office data associated with these areas.
Q4. One  of  the  problems  within  the  NPOESS  program  was  resistance  to  reducing
requirements  even  in  the  face  of  escalating  costs,  schedule  slips,  and  serious
technical problems with sensor development. Has NOAA set up a better decision
process for addressing his type of issue?

A4. In  our  testimony  statement,  we  credited  NOAA  with  its  decision  to  review  re-
quirements  and  to  restructure  the  scope  of  the  program  as  the  GOES–R  system’s
technical complexity became better understood. However, we did not assess NOAA’s
decision  process—including  what  analysis  has  been  done,  which  users  are  involved,
or  what  alternatives  were  considered  leading  to  its  decision  to  reduce  the  scope  of
the program—because it was outside the scope of our review. Until this information
is  available  and  a  baselined  set  of  validated  requirements  is  developed,  it  remains
to be seen whether this is an improved decision process.
Q5. How  can  we  ensure  that  the  process  of  reconciling  the  different  cost  estimates
for  this  program  will  be  objective  and  result  in  a  realistic  cost  estimate  for
GOES–R?  How  confident  should  we  be  that  the  cost  models  employed,  both  by
the program office and by the independent estimator, provide accurate and com-
plete estimates given the recurring problems with cost estimation in NOAA’s pre-
vious programs?

A5. In  our  statement,  we  recommended  that  NOAA  establish  a  process  for  objec-
tively evaluating and reconciling the government and independent life cycle cost es-
timates  once  the  scope  of  the  GOES–R  program  has  been  finalized.  To  ensure  this
process  will  be  objective,  it  is  important  that  this  process  be  transparent  to  all  af-
fected  entities—from  the  program  office  up  to  all  oversight  organizations.  In  addi-
tion,  NOAA  should  use  realistic  assumptions,  a  high  confidence  factor,  and  that
same confidence factor across all cost estimates for an even comparison.

Given  that  the  GOES–R  system  is  still  in  the  preliminary  design  phase  and  re-
quirements  are  still  being  finalized,  the  cost  estimates  for  this  program  will  be
somewhat  imprecise.  The  accuracy  of  the  cost  estimates  are  contingent  on  the  cost
models and the comprehensiveness of the independent cost estimator’s analysis. We
plan to further evaluate the completed cost estimates by the independent estimator
and program office in a follow-on review.

In responding to these questions, we relied on previously reported information on
GOES–R  and  other  satellite  programs,  as  well  as  agency  documentation  describing
GOES–R  management  responsibilities.  We  performed  our  work  in  accordance  with
generally accepted government auditing standards during October 2006.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:32 Jan 02, 2007 Jkt 029950 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL06\092906\29950 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

